Nevada, session 83, SB78.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 231.700 is hereby amended to read as follows:
231.700 The [Commission] Nevada Aviation Technical
Advisory Committee shall:
1. Administer the Fund; and
2. Adopt any regulations necessary or convenient to carry out
the provisions of NRS 231.600 to 231.720, inclusive.
-
*SB78*

– 9 –
Sec. 2. Chapter 232 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 3 to 16, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 3. As used in NRS 232.8413 and 232.8415 and sections
3 to 16, inclusive, of this act, unless the context otherwise requires,
the words and terms defined in sections 4 and 5 of this act have
the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 4. “Deputy Director” means the Deputy Director of the
Office.
Sec. 5. “Office” means the Office of Nevada Boards,
Commissions and Councils Standards within the Department
created by NRS 232.8413.
Sec. 6. 1. The Director may appoint a General Counsel of
the Office and as many deputies to the General Counsel as the
Director deems necessary to carry out the duties and the functions
of the Office.
2. The General Counsel and each deputy appointed pursuant
to subsection 1:
(a) Is in the unclassified service of the State.
(b) Must be an attorney in good standing licensed and
admitted to practice law in this State.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 7.065, shall not
engage in the private practice of law.
3. The Director may retain an attorney other than the
General Counsel or a deputy appointed pursuant to subsection 1 if
the Director determines that it is impracticable, uneconomical or
could constitute a conflict of interest for the legal service to be
rendered by the General Counsel or a deputy.
Sec. 7. 1. The Office shall periodically conduct a review of
each board, commission, council and similar body in this State
within the Executive Department of the State Government which
is not provided for in the Nevada Constitution or established by an
executive order of the Governor to determine whether the board,
commission, council or similar body should be terminated,
modified, consolidated with another board, commission, council or
similar body or continued.
2. A review conducted pursuant to subsection 1 must include,
without limitation:
(a) An evaluation of the:
(1) Effectiveness and relevance of the board, commission,
council or similar body.
(2) Usefulness and performance of the board, commission,
council or similar body.
(3) Cost and resource utilization of the board, commission,
council or similar body.
-
*SB78*

– 10 –
(4) Amount and quality of stakeholder and public
engagement of the board, commission, council or similar body.
(b) A comparative analysis between the board, commission,
council or similar body and other comparable boards,
commissions, councils or similar bodies.
3. A board, commission, council or similar body shall
cooperate with the Office in the conducting of a review pursuant
to subsection 1 and shall submit to the Office, upon request, any
information the Office deems necessary for the conducting of the
review.
4. A board, commission, council or similar body subject to a
review by the Office has the burden of proving that its continuing
existence is justified.
Sec. 8. The Office shall establish a schedule for conducting
reviews pursuant to section 7 of this act. The schedule must
provide for conducting a review of any advisory body that is
subject to termination pursuant to a provision of state legislation
described in section 29 of this act before the date on which the
board, commission, council or similar body is set to terminate.
Sec. 9. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, at
the conclusion of a review conducted pursuant to section 7 of this
act, the Deputy Director shall submit to the Governor a
recommendation as to whether the board, commission, council or
similar body should be terminated, modified, consolidated with
another board, commission, council or similar body or continued.
The Governor shall, if necessary, request the drafting of a
legislative measure pursuant to NRS 218D.175 to effectuate the
recommendation.
2. If the board, commission, council or similar body subject
to review is an advisory body described in section 29 of this act
and, at the conclusion of the review, the Deputy Director finds
that:
(a) During the period since the last review conducted of the
advisory body, or, if a review has never been conducted, since the
creation of the advisory body:
(1) The advice and recommendations of the advisory body
has resulted in legislative or administrative action;
(2) The advisory body has complied with its statutory
obligations; and
(3) The advisory body has met consistently; and
(b) The duties and responsibilities of the advisory body are not
overly duplicative of any other board, commission, council or
similar body,
-
*SB78*

– 11 –
 the Deputy Director shall send a notice to the Governor and the
Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau recommending the
continuation of the advisory body.
Sec. 10. 1. The Office may, by regulation, establish the
procedures and requirements relating to the appointment of
members to a board, commission, council or similar body under
the purview of the Office pursuant to NRS 232.8415.
2. The Office may require any board, commission, council or
similar body under the purview of the Office pursuant to NRS
232.8415, before entering into a contract of any kind, to submit
the contract to and obtain the approval of the Office.
Sec. 11. 1. The Office shall provide to each board,
commission, council or similar body under the purview of the
Office pursuant to NRS 232.8415 administrative services,
including, without limitation:
(a) Legal services;
(b) Accounting services;
(c) Information technology services;
(d) Services pertaining to activities designed to influence the
passage or defeat of any legislation; and
(e) The services of hearing officers to adjudicate contested
cases.
2. The Office shall, by regulation:
(a) Prescribe a fee to cover the costs incurred by the Office for
any service provided by the Office pursuant to subsection 1; and
(b) Adopt such procedures as the Office may deem appropriate
for the billing or collection of such fees from a board, commission,
council or similar body to which such a service is provided.
3. A board, commission, council or similar body under the
purview of the Office pursuant to NRS 232.8415 may not pay any
compensation to a natural person or entity other than the Office
for a service that the Office provides.
4. Any money the Office receives pursuant to this section
must be deposited in the State Treasury for credit to the Office of
Nevada Boards, Commissions and Councils Standards Account
created by section 12 of this act.
Sec. 12. 1. The Office of Nevada Boards, Commissions and
Councils Standards Account is hereby created in the State General
Fund. The Account must be administered by the Deputy Director
and may be expended only to carry out the provisions of NRS
232.8413 and 232.8415 and sections 3 to 16, inclusive, of this act.
2. The interest and income earned on the money in the
Account, after deducting applicable charges, must be credited to
the Account.
-
*SB78*

– 12 –
3. Any money in the Account and any unexpended
appropriations made to the Account from the State General Fund
remaining at the end of a fiscal year do not revert to the State
General Fund, and the balance in the Account must be carried
forward to the next fiscal year.
4. The Deputy Director may apply for and accept any gift,
grant, donation or appropriation for deposit in the Account.
Sec. 13. 1. A board, commission, council or similar body
under the purview of the Office pursuant to NRS 232.8415 may
not request that any person or governmental entity submit to the
Legislative Counsel a request for the drafting of a legislative
measure on behalf of the board, commission, council or similar
body other than as set forth in this section.
2. If a board, commission, council or similar body under the
purview of the Office pursuant to NRS 232.8415 wishes that a
request for the drafting of a legislative measure be submitted to
the Legislative Counsel on behalf of the board, commission,
council or similar body, it must submit the request to the Deputy
Director for approval. If the Deputy Director approves the request:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), the Deputy
Director shall forward the request to the Governor or the
Governor’s designated representative. If the Governor or the
Governor’s designated representative approves the request, he or
she may submit the request to the Legislative Counsel pursuant to
NRS 218D.175.
(b) If the board, commission, council or similar body is an
authorized nonlegislative requester entitled to submit a request for
the drafting of a legislative measure pursuant to NRS 218D.175 to
218D.220, inclusive, the board, commission, council or similar
body may submit the request to the Legislative Counsel in
accordance with the applicable provisions of NRS 218D.175 to
218D.220, inclusive.
Sec. 14. 1. The person appointed by the Governor as the
administrative head of the department of the Executive
Department of the State Government within which a board,
commission, council or similar body is under the purview of the
Office pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 232.8415 is responsible for
the effective operation of the board, commission, council or
similar body and may establish guidelines and requirements to
ensure such effective operation.
2. A board, commission, council or similar body under the
purview of the Office pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 232.8415
may meet only upon the:
(a) Call of the Chair of the board, commission, council or
similar body;
-
*SB78*

– 13 –
(b) Written request of a majority of the members of the board,
commission, council or similar body; or
(c) Call of the administrative head of the department
responsible for the effective operation of the board, commission,
council or similar body pursuant to subsection 1.
Sec. 15. 1. The Office shall maintain an Internet website
through which any board, commission, council or similar body
under its purview pursuant to NRS 232.8415 may post
information.
2. A board, commission, council or similar body under the
purview of the Office pursuant to NRS 232.8415 may not post any
information on any Internet website other than the Internet
website maintained pursuant to subsection 1.
Sec. 16. The Office may:
1. Have access to, inspect, copy and subpoena all records in
the possession of any clerk of a court, law enforcement agency or
public or private institution, wherever situated, that relate to its
duties.
2. Have access to all written records in the possession of any
person, government, governmental agency or political subdivision
of a government that relate to its duties.
3. Use the information obtained pursuant to subsections 1
and 2 to resolve matters relating to its duties.
Sec. 17. NRS 232.383 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.383 1. The Grants Management Advisory Committee is
hereby created within the Department.
2. The Advisory Committee consists of the following [15] 11
members appointed by the Director:
(a) A superintendent of a county school district or the
superintendent’s designee;
(b) A director of a local agency which provides services for
abused or neglected children, or the director’s designee;
(c) A member who possesses knowledge, skill and experience in
the provision of services to children;
(d) A representative of a department of juvenile justice services;
(e) A member who possesses knowledge, skill and experience in
the provision of services to senior citizens;
(f) [Two members] A member who [possess] possesses
knowledge, skill and experience in finance or in business generally;
(g) A representative of the Nevada Association of Counties;
(h) A member who possesses knowledge, skill and experience in
building partnerships between the public sector and the private
sector;
-
*SB78*

– 14 –
(i) [Two members] A member of the public who [possess]
possesses knowledge of or experience in the provision of services to
persons or families who are disadvantaged or at risk;
(j) A member who possesses knowledge, skill and experience in
the provision of services to persons with disabilities; and
(k) A member who possesses knowledge, skill and experience in
the provision of services relating to the cessation of the use of
tobacco , [;
(l) A member who possesses knowledge, skill and experience]
in the provision of health services to children [; and
(m) A representative who is a member of the Nevada
Commission on Aging, created by NRS 427A.032, who must not be
a Legislator.] or both. In appointing the member pursuant to this
paragraph, the Director must give preference to a person who
possesses knowledge, skill and experience in both the provision of
services relating to the cessation of the use of tobacco and the
provision of health services to children.
3. An entity who employs a member of the Advisory
Committee is not eligible to receive a grant. This subsection does
not prohibit an entity that serves solely as the fiscal agent for a
recipient of a grant from employing a member of the Advisory
Committee.
4. The Director shall ensure that, insofar as practicable, the
members whom the Director appoints reflect the ethnic and
geographical diversity of this State.
5. After the initial terms, each member of the Advisory
Committee serves for a term of 2 years. Each member of the
Advisory Committee continues in office until his or her successor is
appointed. A member may not serve more than two terms.
6. [Each member of the Advisory Committee who is not an
officer or employee of this State or a political subdivision of this
State is entitled to receive a salary of not more than $80 per day,
fixed by the Director, while engaged in the business of the Advisory
Committee.
7.] While engaged in the business of the Advisory Committee,
each member of the Advisory Committee is entitled to receive the
per diem allowance and travel expenses provided for state officers
and employees generally.
[8.] 7. A majority of the members of the Advisory Committee
constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business, and a majority
of a quorum present at any meeting is sufficient for any official
action taken by the Advisory Committee.
[9.] 8. A member of the Advisory Committee who is an officer
or employee of this State or a political subdivision of this State must
be relieved from his or her duties without loss of regular
-
*SB78*

– 15 –
compensation to prepare for and attend meetings of the Advisory
Committee and perform any work necessary to carry out the duties
of the Advisory Committee in the most timely manner practicable.
A state agency or political subdivision of this State shall not require
an officer or employee who is a member of the Advisory Committee
to:
(a) Make up the time he or she is absent from work to carry out
his or her duties as a member of the Advisory Committee; or
(b) Take annual leave or compensatory time for the absence.
[10.] 9. The Advisory Committee shall:
(a) At its first meeting and annually thereafter, elect a Chair
from among its members; and
(b) [Meet at the call of the Director, the Chair or a majority of its
members as necessary, within the budget of the Advisory
Committee, but not to exceed six meetings per year; and
(c)] Adopt rules for its own management and government.
Sec. 18. NRS 232.4855 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.4855 1. The [State of Nevada Advisory Council]
Subcommittee on Palliative Care and Quality of Life of the State
Board of Health is hereby created . [within the Department.]
2. The [Director] State Board of Health shall appoint such
number of members of the [Council] Subcommittee as [he or she]
the Board determines is appropriate to carry out the provisions of
NRS 232.485 to 232.4858, inclusive, but not less than nine members
as follows:
(a) Two members with experience in the provision of
interdisciplinary palliative care, including, without limitation,
hospital, medical, nursing, social work, pharmacy, financial and
spiritual services;
(b) One member with a background in patient and family
caregiver advocacy;
(c) One member who is a health care professional with clinical
experience in palliative care;
(d) One member who is a health care professional with expertise
in delivery models for palliative care in a variety of inpatient,
outpatient and community settings and with diverse populations;
(e) Two members who are employees of the Department or any
other state agency, board or commission who have relevant work
experience related to palliative care and issues concerning quality of
life; and
(f) Two members who are board certified hospice and palliative
care physicians or nurses.
3. After the initial terms, the term of each member of the
[Council] Subcommittee is 3 years, and members shall serve at the
pleasure of the [Director.] State Board of Health.
-
*SB78*

– 16 –
4. The [Council] Subcommittee shall select from its members a
Chair and a Vice Chair who shall hold office for 1 year and whose
duties will be established by the [Council.] Subcommittee.
5. The [Council] Subcommittee shall meet at least twice
annually at a time and place specified by a call of the [Director.]
State Board of Health.
6. Each member of the [Council:] Subcommittee:
(a) Serves without compensation; and
(b) While engaged in the business of the [Council,]
Subcommittee, is entitled to receive the per diem allowance and
travel expenses provided for state officers and employees generally
to the extent that funds for such expenses are available within the
budget of the Department.
Sec. 19. NRS 232.4966 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.4966 1. The Council on Food Security is hereby created
within the Department. The Council consists of:
(a) The Governor or his or her designee;
(b) The Director or his or her designee from within the
Department;
(c) The Administrator of the Division of Welfare and Supportive
Services of the Department or his or her designee from within the
Division;
(d) The Regional Administrator for the Western Regional Office
of the United States Department of Agriculture, Food and Nutrition
Service or his or her designee from within the United States
Department of Agriculture;
(e) The Executive Director of the Office of Economic
Development or his or her designee from within the Office; and
(f) [The Administrator of the Division of Public and Behavioral
Health of the Department or his or her designee from within the
Division;
(g) The Superintendent of Public Instruction or his or her
designee from within the Department of Education;
(h) The Director of the State Department of Agriculture or his or
her designee from within the Department;
(i) The Administrator of the Aging and Disability Services
Division of the Department or his or her designee from within the
Division;
(j) Five] Six members appointed by the [Governor] Director as
follows:
(1) One member who is a representative of retailers of food;
(2) [One member who is a representative of manufacturing
that is not related to food;
(3) One member who is a representative of the gaming
industry, hospitality industry or restaurant industry;
-
*SB78*

– 17 –
(4)] One member who is a representative of farmers or
ranchers engaged in food production; [and
(5)] (3) One member [who is a representative of persons
engaged in the business of processing or distributing food;
(k) At least five members appointed by the Governor or the
Director at the direction of the Governor from among the following
persons:
(1) A person] who is a representative of a food bank serving
northern or southern Nevada;
[(2) A person who is a representative of a food bank serving
southern Nevada;
(3) A person]
(4) One member who is a representative of an organization
that provides community-based services, including, without
limitation, services that focus on the social determinants of health ;
[, in northern Nevada;
(4) A person who is a representative of an organization that
provides community-based services, including, without limitation,
services that focus on the social determinants of health, in southern
Nevada;
(5) A person who is a representative of an organization that
provides community-based services, including, without limitation,
services that focus on the social determinants of health, in rural
Nevada;
(6) A person who is a representative of the University of
Nevada Cooperative Extension;
(7) A person]
(5) One member who possesses knowledge, skill and experience
in the provision of services to senior citizens and persons with
disabilities; and
[(8) A person who is a representative of a local health
authority; and
(9) A person]
(6) One member who possesses knowledge, skill and experience
in the provision of services to children and families . [; and
(l) Such other representatives of State Government as may be
designated by the Governor.]
2. The Governor or his or her designee shall serve as the Chair
of the Council.
3. Each appointed member of the Council serves a term of 2
years. Each appointed member may be reappointed at the pleasure
of the appointing authority, except that an appointed member may
not serve for more than [three consecutive] two terms . [or 6
consecutive years.]
-
*SB78*

– 18 –
4. If a vacancy occurs in the appointed membership of the
Council, the Council shall recommend a person to the appointing
authority who appointed that member to fill the vacancy. The
appointing authority shall appoint a replacement member after
receiving and considering the recommendation of the Council. A
member appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve as a member of the
Council for the remainder of the original term of appointment and
may be reappointed for [two] an additional [consecutive terms] term
through the regular appointment process.
5. The appointing authority may remove a member for
malfeasance in office or neglect of duty. Absences from three
consecutive meetings constitutes good and sufficient cause for
removal of a member.
6. Each member of the Council:
(a) Serves without compensation; and
(b) While engaged in the business of the Council, is entitled to
receive the per diem allowance and travel expenses provided for
state officers and employees generally.
7. [The] Except as otherwise provided in section 11 of this
act, the Department of Health and Human Services shall provide
administrative support to the Council.
8. [The Council shall meet at least once each calendar quarter
and may meet at such further times as deemed necessary by the
Chair.
9.] The Council may apply for and accept gifts, grants,
donations and contributions from any source for the purpose of
carrying out its duties pursuant to NRS 232.4968.
Sec. 20. NRS 232.570 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.570 1. There is hereby created in the Division an
Advisory Council composed of seven members appointed by the
[Governor.] Director.
2. The Advisory Council must be composed of:
(a) Three representatives of labor, at least two of whom must
represent organized labor;
(b) Three representatives of management, at least two of whom
must represent employers who employ at least 250 persons; and
(c) One representative of the general public who is
knowledgeable in the field of industrial relations.
3. Each member of the Council serves a term of 2 years. A
member of the Council may not serve more than two terms.
4. Any member who is appointed to fill a vacancy must be
appointed in the same manner and possess the same general
qualifications as his or her predecessor in office.
-
*SB78*

– 19 –
Sec. 21. NRS 232.580 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.580 1. The Council [shall meet at least once annually at a
time and place specified by a call of the Chair, the Administrator or
a majority of the Council. Special meetings, not to exceed six per
year, may be held at the call of the Chair, the Administrator or a
majority of the Council.
2. The Council] shall select from its members a Chair and a
Vice Chair who shall hold office for 1 year. The Administrator shall
act as Secretary of the Council.
[3.] 2. The Council may prescribe such bylaws as it deems
necessary for its operation.
[4.] 3. Four members of the Council constitute a quorum, and
a quorum may exercise all the power and authority conferred on the
Council.
Sec. 22. NRS 232.590 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.590 Each member of the Council serves without
compensation but is entitled to receive [a salary of $60 for each
day’s attendance at a meeting of the Council.] the per diem
allowance and travel expenses provided for state officers and
employees generally for attending a meeting of the Council or
while engaged in the official business of the Council.
Sec. 23. NRS 232.8413 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.8413 1. The Office of Nevada Boards, Commissions and
Councils Standards is hereby created within the Department of
Business and Industry.
2. The Director shall [appoint] :
(a) Appoint a Deputy Director of the Office [and shall retain] ;
(b) Retain the required staff [and adopt the necessary
regulations and procedures] to effectively administer the
responsibilities of the Office [.] , which may include, without
limitation, hearing officers, accountants and any other
professional, clerical and operational employees as the operation
of the Office may require; and
(c) Adopt the necessary regulations and procedures to
effectively administer the responsibilities of the Office.
Sec. 24. NRS 232.8415 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.8415 1. The Office [of Nevada Boards, Commissions
and Councils Standards] shall be responsible for:
(a) Centralized administration;
(b) A uniform set of standards for investigations, licensing and
discipline, including, without limitation, separating the roles
and responsibilities for occupational licensure from the roles and
responsibilities for occupational discipline;
(c) A uniform set of standards for internal controls;
(d) A uniform set of standards for legal representation;
-
*SB78*

– 20 –
(e) A consistent set of structural standards for boards and
commissions;
(f) Transparency and consumer protection; and
(g) Efficacy and efficiency.
2. To the extent permitted by the Nevada Constitution and
federal law, all professional and occupational licensing boards
created by the Legislature shall be under the purview of the Office,
including, without limitation:
(a) The Nevada State Board of Accountancy created by
NRS 628.035.
(b) The [Board of Examiners for Alcohol, Drug and Gambling
Counselors created by NRS 641C.150.] Nevada Behavioral
Wellness Alliance Board created by section 93 of this act.
(c) The [State Board of Architecture, Interior Design and
Residential Design created by NRS 623.050.] Nevada Board of
Professional Design and Environmental Specialist created by
section 80 of this act.
(d) The [Board of Athletic Trainers created by NRS 640B.170.]
Nevada Board of Healing and Rehabilitative Practice created by
section 89 of this act.
(e) The State Barbers’ Health and Sanitation Board created by
NRS 643.020.
(f) The [Board of Applied Behavior Analysis created by
NRS 641D.200.
(g) The Chiropractic Physicians’ Board of Nevada created by
NRS 634.020.
(h) The] State Contractors’ Board created by NRS 624.040.
[(i)] (g) The Commission on Construction Education created by
NRS 624.570.
[(j)] (h) The State Board of Cosmetology created by
NRS 644A.200.
[(k)] (i) The Certified Court Reporters’ Board of Nevada
created by NRS 656.040.
[(l)] (j) The Board of Dental Examiners of Nevada created by
NRS 631.120.
[(m) The Committee on Dental Hygiene and Dental Therapy
created by NRS 631.205.
(n) The State Board of Professional Engineers and Land
Surveyors created by NRS 625.100.
(o)] (k) The Nevada Funeral and Cemetery Services Board
created by NRS 642.020.
[(p)] (l) The Nevada Medical Board [of Homeopathic Medical
Examiners] created [pursuant to NRS 630A.100.
(q) The State Board of Landscape Architecture created by
NRS 623A.080.
-
*SB78*

– 21 –
(r) The Board of Examiners for Marriage and Family Therapists
and Clinical Professional Counselors created by NRS 641A.090.
(s) The Board of Massage Therapy created by NRS 640C.150.
(t) The Board of Medical Examiners created pursuant to
NRS 630.050.
(u)] by section 86 of this act.
(m) The State Board of Nursing created by NRS 632.020.
[(v) The Advisory Committee on Nursing Assistants and
Medication Aides created by NRS 632.072.
(w) The Board of Occupational Therapy created by
NRS 640A.080.
(x) The Board of Dispensing Opticians created by NRS 637.030.
(y)] (n) The Nevada [State] Board of [Optometry] Vision,
Speech and Mobility Professions created by [NRS 636.030.
(z) The State Board of Oriental Medicine created by
NRS 634A.030.
(aa) The State Board of Osteopathic Medicine created pursuant
to NRS 633.181.
(bb)] section 91 of this act.
(o) The Commission on Postsecondary Education created by
NRS 394.383.
[(cc)] (p) The State Board of Pharmacy created by
NRS 639.020.
[(dd) The Nevada Physical Therapy Board created by
NRS 640.030.
(ee) The State Board of Podiatry created by NRS 635.020.
(ff)] (q) The Private Investigator’s Licensing Board created by
NRS 648.020.
[(gg) The Board of Psychological Examiners created by
NRS 641.030.
(hh) The Board of Environmental Health Specialists created by
NRS 625A.030.
(ii) The Board of Examiners for Social Workers created
pursuant to NRS 641B.100.
(jj) The Speech-Language Pathology, Audiology and Hearing
Aid Dispensing Board created by NRS 637B.100.
(kk)] (r) The Nevada State Board of Veterinary Medical
Examiners created by NRS 638.020.
3. The following boards, commissions, councils and similar
bodies shall be under the purview of the Office:
(a) The State Council on Libraries and Literacy created by
NRS 380A.031.
(b) The State Records and Historical Advisory Council created
by section 30 of this act.
-
*SB78*

– 22 –
(c) The Nevada Merit and Honors Board created by section 32
of this act.
(d) The State Predatory Animal and Rodent Committee created
by NRS 567.020.
(e) The Advisory Council created by NRS 232.570.
(f) The Private Activity Bond Council created by
NRS 348A.050.
(g) The Advisory Committee on Housing created by
NRS 319.174.
(h) The Advisory Council on Mortgage Investments and
Mortgage Lending created by NRS 645B.019.
(i) The Nevada Commission on Minority Affairs created by
NRS 232.852.
(j) The State Outdoor Recreation and Education Advisory
Council within the Department created by section 51 of this act.
(k) The Commission on Off-Highway Vehicles in the State
Department of Conservation and Natural Resources created by
NRS 490.067.
(l) The Land Use Planning Advisory Council created by
NRS 321.740.
(m) The Well Drillers’ Advisory Board created pursuant to
NRS 534.150.
(n) The Advisory Committee on School and Staff Safety in the
Department of Education created by section 43 of this act.
(o) The Nevada Commission on Innovation, Excellence and
Education Workforce Development in the Department of
Education created by section 38 of this act.
(p) The Commission on School Funding created by
NRS 387.1246.
(q) The Nevada Commission on Mentoring created by
NRS 385.760.
(r) The State Council for the Coordination of the Interstate
Compact on Educational Opportunity for Military Children
created by NRS 388F.020.
(s) The Teachers and Leaders Council of Nevada created by
NRS 391.455.
(t) The Advisory Council for Family Engagement created
pursuant to NRS 385.610.
(u) The Nevada Interscholastic Activities Association created
pursuant to NRS 385B.050.
(v) The State Financial Literacy Advisory Council created by
NRS 388.5966.
(w) The Committee on Responses to Power-Based Violence in
Schools in the Department of Education created by NRS 388.1326.
-
*SB78*

– 23 –
(x) The Advisory Committee on Language Development for
Children Who Are Deaf, Hard of Hearing, Blind or Visually
Impaired in the Department of Education created pursuant to
NRS 388.5175.
(y) The Nevada Emergency Response and Disaster
Coordination Board created by section 52 of this act.
(z) The Board for the Education and Counseling of Displaced
Homemakers created by NRS 388.615.
(aa) The Nevada Committee of Vendors Who Are Blind elected
pursuant to NRS 426.670 and 34 C.F.R. § 395.14.
(bb) The Advisory Committee on Problem Gambling created by
NRS 458A.060.
(cc) A regional behavioral health policy board created by
NRS 433.429.
(dd) The Nevada Commission on Aging and Cognitive Health
created by section 60 of this act.
(ee) The Council on Food Security within the Department of
Health and Human Services created by NRS 232.4966.
(ff) The Nevada Early Childhood Advisory Council established
by NRS 432A.076.
(gg) The Patient Protection Commission within the Office of
the Director of the Department of Health and Human Services
created by NRS 439.908.
(hh) The Advisory Committee for a Resilient Nevada within
the Department of Health and Human Services created by
NRS 433.726.
(ii) The Advisory Committee on Medicaid Innovation in the
Division of Health Care Financing and Policy of the Department
of Health and Human Services created by NRS 422.162.
(jj) The Committee to Review Suicide Fatalities within the
Department of Health and Human Services created by
NRS 439.5104.
(kk) The committee appointed pursuant to NRS 422A.660.
(ll) The Wellness and Prevention Advisory Council created by
section 65 of this act.
(mm) The Grants Management Advisory Committee within the
Department of Health and Human Services created by
NRS 232.383.
(nn) The Health Care Workforce Working Group within the
Department of Health and Human Services established pursuant
to NRS 439A.118.
(oo) The Advisory Board on Maternal and Child Health
created by NRS 442.133.
-
*SB78*

– 24 –
(pp) The Maternal Mortality Review Committee within the
Department of Health and Human Services established by
NRS 442.764.
(qq) The Medicaid Advisory Committee in the Division of
Health Care Financing and Policy of the Department of Health
and Human Services created by NRS 422.151.
(rr) The Beneficiary Advisory Council within the Division of
Health Care Financing and Policy of the Department of Health
and Human Services created by section 55 of this act.
(ss) The Advisory Committee in the Office of Minority Health
and Equity of the Department of Health and Human Services
created by NRS 232.482.
(tt) The Silver State Scripts Board created within the
Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to
NRS 422.4035.
(uu) The Vulnerable Adult Fatality Review Committee within
the Department of Health and Human Services established by
NRS 427A.920.
(vv) The Advisory Committee on the State Program for Oral
Health within the Department of Health and Human Services
created by NRS 439.2792.
(ww) The Advisory Board on Maternal and Child Health
created by NRS 442.133.
(xx) The Nevada Children’s Mental and Behavioral Health
Consortium created by section 64 of this act.
(yy) The Executive Committee to Review the Death of Children
established pursuant to NRS 432B.409.
(zz) Any advisory council or committee created by the
Commissioner of Insurance pursuant to NRS 679B.160.
(aaa) The State of Nevada Human Trafficking Coalition
formed pursuant to NRS 217.098.
(bbb) Any advisory body established by the Administrator
pursuant to NRS 439A.170 to advise the Administrator on matters
concerning the Physician Visa Waiver Program.
(ccc) The Committee to Review Child Support Guidelines
created by NRS 425.610.
(ddd) The advisory committee created pursuant to subsection 8
of NRS 445B.830.
(eee) The Nevada Indian Commission within the Department
of Native American Affairs created by NRS 233A.1005.
(fff) The Committee on Testing for Intoxication created by
NRS 484C.600.
(ggg) The Nevada Sentencing Commission within the
Department of Sentencing Policy created by NRS 176.0133.
-
*SB78*

– 25 –
(hhh) The Nevada Local Justice Reinvestment Coordinating
Council created by NRS 176.014.
(iii) The Subcommittee on Misdemeanors of the Sentencing
Commission created by NRS 176.01332.
(jjj) The Appraiser’s Certification Board established by
NRS 361.221.
(kkk) The Committee on Local Government Finance created
by NRS 354.105.
(lll) The Board of Museums and History created by
NRS 381.002.
(mmm) The Nevada Bicycle and Pedestrian Advisory Board
created by NRS 408.573.
(nnn) The Board of Directors of the Nevada State
Infrastructure Bank within the Office of the Treasurer established
by NRS 226.778.
(ooo) The Advisory Committee on Traffic Safety within the
Department of Transportation created by NRS 408.581.
(ppp) The Interagency Council on Veterans Affairs created by
NRS 417.0191.
(qqq) The Nevada Veterans Services Commission created by
NRS 417.150.
(rrr) The Advisory Committee for a Veterans Cemetery in
Northern Nevada created by NRS 417.230.
(sss) The Advisory Committee for a Veterans Cemetery in
Southern Nevada created by NRS 417.230.
(ttt) The Women Veterans Advisory Committee created by
NRS 417.320.
(uuu) The Regional Transmission Coordination Task Force
created by NRS 704.79887.
(vvv) The Nevada Advisory Council on Federal Assistance
created by NRS 358.020.
(www) The Informational Technology Advisory Board created
by NRS 242.122.
(xxx) The Advisory Council on Graduate Medical Education
within the Office of Science, Innovation and Technology created
by NRS 223.633.
(yyy) The California-Nevada Super Speed Ground
Transportation Commission created by NRS 705.4293.
Sec. 25. NRS 232.864 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.864 1. [The Director] Except as otherwise provided in
section 11 of this act, the Office of Minority Health and Equity of
the Department of Health and Human Services shall provide staff
assistance to the Commission as the Governor deems appropriate.
-
*SB78*

– 26 –
2. The Commission may engage the services of volunteer
workers and consultants without compensation as is necessary from
time to time.
Sec. 26. NRS 233.030 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233.030 1. The Nevada Equal Rights Commission, consisting
of [five] eight members appointed by the Governor, is hereby
created.
2. The Governor shall appoint to the Commission:
(a) The following voting members:
(1) One member who represents an advocacy organization
whose membership consists of persons with disabilities.
(2) One member who is a member of the Nevada
Association of the Deaf or one member who is deaf or hard of
hearing.
(3) One member who is an expert on diversity and
inclusion.
(4) One member who is an educator or an academic with
expertise in diversity.
(5) One member who is deaf, hard of hearing or
speech-impaired.
(6) One member who serves as a public advocate for an
organization that advocates for public education or civil rights.
(7) One member who is the parent or guardian of a child
with disabilities.
(b) One nonvoting member who is employed by the State and
who participates in the administration of the programs of this
State that provide services to persons with disabilities.
3. Each member of the Commission is entitled to receive a
salary of not more than $80, as fixed by the Commission, for each
day actually employed on the work of the Commission.
[3.] 4. While engaged in the business of the Commission, each
member and employee of the Commission is entitled to receive the
per diem allowance and travel expenses provided for state officers
and employees generally.
Sec. 27. NRS 0.040 is hereby amended to read as follows:
0.040 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
“physician” means a person who engages in the practice of
medicine, including osteopathy . [and homeopathy.]
2. The terms “physician,” “osteopathic physician,”
[“homeopathic physician,”] “chiropractic physician” and “podiatric
physician” are used in chapters 630, [630A,] 633, 634 and 635 of
NRS in the limited senses prescribed by those chapters respectively.
Sec. 28. NRS 62B.600 is hereby amended to read as follows:
62B.600 1. The Juvenile Justice Oversight Commission is
hereby established.
-
*SB78*

– 27 –
2. The Commission consists of the Governor or his or her
designee and [25] 11 members appointed by the Governor. The
Governor shall appoint to the Commission:
(a) [Two members] One member nominated by the Senate, who
[are] is not [members] a member of the Senate or a public [officers.]
officer.
(b) [Two members] One member nominated by the Assembly,
who [are] is not [members] a member of the Assembly or a public
[officers.] officer.
(c) [Two members] One member nominated by the Supreme
Court, who [are] is not [judges, justices] a judge, justice or public
[officers.] officer.
(d) The Administrator of the Division of Child and Family
Services or his or her designee.
(e) The Deputy Administrator of Juvenile Services of the
Division of Child and Family Services or his or her designee.
(f) Three members who are directors of juvenile services, one
each of whom must represent a county whose population:
(1) Is less than 100,000.
(2) Is 100,000 or more but less than 700,000.
(3) Is 700,000 or more.
(g) [Two members] One member who [are] is a district
[attorneys.] attorney.
(h) [Two members] One member who [are] is a public
[defenders.] defender.
(i) One member who is a representative of a law enforcement
agency.
[(j) Two members who are representatives of a nonprofit
organization which provides programs to prevent juvenile
delinquency.
(k) One member who is a volunteer who works with children
who have been adjudicated delinquent.
(l) Six members who are under the age of 24 years at the time of
appointment.]
3. At least three of the persons appointed to the Commission
pursuant to subsection 2 must be persons who are currently or were
formerly subject to the jurisdiction of the juvenile court.
4. Each appointed member serves a term of 2 years. Members
may be reappointed for one additional [terms] term of 2 years in the
same manner as the original appointments. Any vacancy occurring
in the membership of the Commission must be filled in the same
manner as the original appointment not later than 30 days after the
vacancy occurs. Nine of the initial members of the Commission who
are appointed pursuant to subsection 2 must be appointed to an
-
*SB78*

– 28 –
initial term of 1 year. Each member of the Commission continues in
office until his or her successor is appointed.
5. The members of the Commission serve without
compensation but are entitled to receive the per diem allowance and
travel expenses provided for state officers and employees generally.
6. A majority of the members of the Commission constitutes a
quorum for the transaction of business, and a majority of a quorum
present at any meeting is sufficient for any official action taken by
the Commission.
7. A member of the Commission who is an officer or employee
of this State or a political subdivision of this State must be relieved
from his or her duties without loss of regular compensation to
prepare for and attend meetings of the Commission and perform any
work necessary to carry out the duties of the Commission in the
most timely manner practicable. A state agency or political
subdivision of this State shall not require an officer or employee
who is a member of the Commission to:
(a) Make up the time he or she is absent from work to carry out
his or her duties as a member of the Commission; or
(b) Take annual leave or compensatory time for the absence.
8. At the first meeting of the Commission and annually
thereafter:
(a) The Governor shall appoint a Chair of the Commission;
(b) The Commission shall elect a Secretary from among its
members; and
(c) The Commission shall adopt rules for its own management
and government.
9. [The Commission shall:
(a) Hold its first meeting within 60 days after all the initial
appointments to the Commission are made pursuant to subsection 2;
and
(b) Meet at least once every 4 months and may meet at such
further times as deemed necessary by the Chair.
10.] As used in this section, “public officer” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 205.4627.
Sec. 29. Chapter 218D of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Any legislative measure enacted on or after July 1, 2026,
which contains a provision creating an advisory body must provide
for:
(a) The expiration by limitation of the provision 2 years after
the effective date of the provision unless, before that date, the
Deputy Director of the Office of Nevada Boards, Commissions and
Councils Standards submits to the Governor and the Director of
the Legislative Counsel Bureau a notice pursuant to subsection 2
-
*SB78*

– 29 –
of section 9 of this act recommending the continuation of the
advisory body.
(b) The extension of the period in which the provision is
effective each time the Deputy Director submits to the Governor
and the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau a notice
pursuant to subsection 2 of section 9 of this act recommending the
continuation of the advisory body for 2 years after the date on
which the notice is submitted.
2. As used in this section, “advisory body” means a board,
commission, council or similar body within the Executive
Department of the State Government whose primary duties are the
rendering of advice or the making of recommendations to another
person or governmental entity. The term does not include a
subcommittee created within a board, commission, council or
similar body which provides advice or makes recommendations to
the board, commission, council or similar body in which it was
created.
Sec. 30. Chapter 239 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The State Records and Historical Advisory Council,
consisting of nine members, is hereby created within the
Department of Administration.
2. The Council consists of:
(a) The Attorney General.
(b) The Secretary of State.
(c) The Chief of the Office of the Chief Information Officer
within the Office of the Governor.
(d) The State Library, Archives and Public Records
Administrator.
(e) The person who is in charge of the archives and records of
the Division of State Library, Archives and Public Records of the
Department of Administration. This person is the State Historical
Records Coordinator for the purposes of 36 C.F.R. § 1206.42.
(f) Four members appointed by the Director of the Department
of Administration as follows:
(1) One member who is a person in charge of a state-
funded historical agency who has responsibilities related to
archives or records, or to both archives and records.
(2) Two members who have experience in the
administration of historical records or archives. These members
must represent as broadly as possible the various public and
private archive and research institutions and organizations in the
State.
(3) One member who is a representative of the general
public.
-
*SB78*

– 30 –
Sec. 31. Chapter 284 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Committee on Human Resources, consisting of seven
members appointed by the Governor, is hereby created within the
Department of Administration.
2. The Governor shall appoint to the Committee:
(a) One member who is a representative of managers within
the Executive Department of the State Government.
(b) One member who is a representative of employees within
the Executive Department of the State Government.
(c) One member who is a representative of employers or
managers within the Executive Department of the State
Government and who has a background in personnel
administration.
(d) One member who is an executive officer of a State agency.
(e) One member who is a representative of labor.
(f) Two members who are representatives of the general
public.
Sec. 32. Chapter 285 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Nevada Merit and Honors Board is hereby created
within the Department of Administration.
2. The Board must be composed of five members who are
residents of this State as follows:
(a) One member from the Budget Division of the Office of
Finance in the Office of the Governor, appointed by the Chief of
the Budget Division.
(b) One member from the Division of Human Resource
Management of the Department of Administration, appointed by
the Administrator of the Division.
(c) Three members appointed by the Governor.
Sec. 33. NRS 354.105 is hereby amended to read as follows:
354.105 1. The Committee on Local Government Finance,
consisting of [11] seven members, is hereby created.
2. The following associations shall each appoint [three] two
members to serve on the Committee:
(a) Nevada League of Cities;
(b) Nevada Association of County Commissioners; and
(c) Nevada Association of School Boards.
3. The Nevada State Board of Accountancy shall appoint [two
members] one member to serve on the Committee.
4. Each appointment must be for a term of [3] 2 years . [, and
each] Each member appointed may be reappointed [to additional]
but may not serve more than two terms.
-
*SB78*

– 31 –
5. A vacancy must be filled as soon as practicable by the
appointing authority of the person who vacated the seat.
6. If any of the associations listed in subsection 2 cease to
exist, the appointments required by subsection 2 must be made by
the association’s successor in interest or, if there is no successor in
interest, one each by the other appointing authorities.
7. The members of the Committee shall elect by majority vote
a member as Chair and another member as Vice Chair, who shall
serve for terms of [3] 2 years or until their successors are elected.
8. [The Committee shall meet not less than twice per year and
may meet at other times upon the call of the Chair or a majority of
the members of the Committee.
9.] A majority of the members of the Committee constitutes a
quorum, and a quorum may exercise all the power and authority
conferred on the Committee.
[10.] 9. Members of the Committee serve without
compensation, except that for each day or portion of a day during
which a member of the Committee attends a meeting of the
Committee or is otherwise engaged in the business of the
Committee, the member is entitled to receive the per diem
allowance and travel expenses provided for state officers and
employees generally.
[11. The]
10. Except as otherwise provided in section 11 of this act, the
Department of Taxation shall provide administrative support to the
Committee.
Sec. 34. NRS 380A.031 is hereby amended to read as follows:
380A.031 1. The State Council on Libraries and Literacy is
hereby created. The Council is advisory to the Division of State
Library, Archives and Public Records of the Department of
Administration.
2. The Council consists of [11] seven members appointed by
the [Governor.] Director of the Department of Administration.
Unless specifically appointed to a shorter term, the term of office of
a member of the Council is [3] 2 years and commences on July 1 of
the year of appointment. The terms of office of the members of the
Council must be staggered to result in, as nearly as possible, the
appointment of three or four members to the Council on July 1 of
each year. An appointed member may not serve more than two
terms.
Sec. 35. NRS 380A.041 is hereby amended to read as follows:
380A.041 1. The [Governor] Director of the Department of
Administration shall appoint to the Council:
(a) A representative of public libraries;
(b) [A trustee of a legally established library or library system;
-
*SB78*

– 32 –
(c)] A representative of school libraries;
[(d)] (c) A representative of academic libraries;
[(e)] (d) A representative of special libraries or institutional
libraries;
[(f)] (e) A representative of persons with disabilities;
[(g) A representative of the public who uses these libraries;
(h) A representative of recognized state labor organizations;
(i) A representative of private sector employers;
(j)] (f) A representative of private literacy organizations,
voluntary literacy organizations or community-based literacy
organizations; and
[(k)] (g) A classroom teacher who has demonstrated
outstanding results in teaching children or adults to read.
2. The director of the following state agencies or their
designees shall serve as ex officio members of the Council:
(a) The Department of Administration;
(b) The Department of Education;
(c) The Department of Employment, Training and
Rehabilitation;
(d) The Department of Health and Human Services;
(e) The Office of Economic Development; and
(f) The Department of Corrections.
3. Officers of State Government whose agencies provide
funding for literacy services may be designated by the [Governor]
Director of the Department of Administration or the Chair of the
Council to serve whenever matters within the jurisdiction of the
agency are considered by the Council.
4. The [Governor] Director of the Department of
Administration shall ensure that there is appropriate representation
on the Council of urban and rural areas of the State, women, persons
with disabilities, and racial and ethnic minorities.
5. A person may not serve as a member of the Council for
more than two [consecutive] terms.
Sec. 36. NRS 381.002 is hereby amended to read as follows:
381.002 1. The Board of Museums and History, consisting of
[twelve] seven members appointed by the [Governor,] Director, is
hereby created.
2. The [Governor] Director shall appoint to the Board:
(a) [Five] Three representatives of the general public who are
knowledgeable about museums, one of whom must be a person with
a disability.
(b) [Six] Three members [representing the fields of history,
prehistoric archeology, historical archeology, architectural history,
and architecture] with qualifications as defined by the Secretary of
-
*SB78*

– 33 –
Interior’s standards for historic preservation in any of the following
fields:
(1) [One member who is qualified in history;] History;
(2) [One member who is qualified in prehistoric] Prehistoric
archeology;
(3) [One member who is qualified in historic] Historic
archeology;
(4) [One member who is qualified in architectural]
Architectural history; or
(5) [One member who is qualified as an architect; and
(6) One additional member who is qualified, as defined by
the Secretary of Interior’s standards for historic preservation, in any
of the fields of expertise described in subparagraphs (1) to (5),
inclusive.] Architecture.
(c) One member, after giving consideration to any
recommendation of an enrolled member of a Nevada Indian tribe
which is submitted by the Nevada Indian Commission, after
consultation with the Inter-Tribal Council of Nevada, Inc., or its
successor organization.
3. The Board shall elect a Chair and a Vice Chair from among
its members at its first meeting of every even-numbered year. The
terms of the Chair and Vice Chair are 2 years or until their
successors are elected.
4. With respect to the functions of the Office of Historic
Preservation, the Board may develop, review and approve policy
for:
(a) Matters relating to the State Historic Preservation Plan;
(b) Nominations to the National Register of Historic Places and
make a determination of eligibility for listing on the Register for
each property nominated; and
(c) Nominations to the State Register of Historic Places and
make determination of eligibility for listing on the Register for each
property nominated.
5. With respect to the functions of the Division, the Board shall
develop, review and make policy for investments, budgets,
expenditures and general control of the Division’s private and
endowed dedicated trust funds pursuant to NRS 381.003 to
381.0037, inclusive.
6. In all other matters pertaining to the Office of Historic
Preservation and the Division of Museums and History, the Board
serves in an advisory capacity.
7. The Board may adopt such regulations as it deems necessary
to carry out its powers and duties.
-
*SB78*

– 34 –
Sec. 37. Chapter 383 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Commission for Cultural and Historic Preservation is
hereby created within the Department.
2. The Commission consists of:
(a) The Chair of the Board of Trustees of Nevada Humanities.
(b) The Chair of the Board of the Nevada Arts Council of the
Department of Tourism and Cultural Affairs.
(c) A member of the Advisory Board appointed by the
Governor after giving consideration to any recommendation of an
enrolled member of a Nevada Indian tribe which is submitted by
the Nevada Indian Commission, after consultation with the Inter-
Tribal Council of Nevada, Inc., or its successor organization.
(d) One representative of the general public who has a
working knowledge of the promotion of tourism in Nevada and
who is appointed by the Governor.
(e) The Chair of the State Council on Libraries and Literacy
or a member of the State Council on Libraries and Literacy
designated by the Chair.
(f) Five members appointed by the Governor as follows:
(1) One member who is licensed as a general engineering
contractor or general building contractor pursuant to chapter 624
of NRS or who holds a certificate of registration to practice
architecture pursuant to chapter 623 of NRS.
(2) Two members who are persons interested in the
protection and preservation of structures, sites and areas of
historic interest and are residents of the State.
(3) One member who is a county commissioner of Storey
County.
(4) One member who is a county commissioner of Lyon
County.
Sec. 38. Chapter 385 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Nevada Commission on Innovation, Excellence and
Education Workforce Development is hereby created within the
Department.
2. The Commission consists of:
(a) One member of the Senate, appointed by the Majority
Leader of the Senate.
(b) One member of the Assembly, appointed by the Speaker of
the Assembly.
(c) The Superintendent of Public Instruction.
(d) One member who is a teacher and member of the Nevada
State Education Association, appointed by the President of that
Association.
-
*SB78*

– 35 –
(e) One member who is a representative of the State Board of
Education, appointed by the President of the State Board.
(f) One member who is a superintendent of schools of a school
district, appointed by the Nevada Association of School
Superintendents.
(g) One member who is the parent or guardian of a pupil who
is enrolled in a public school in this State, appointed by the
Nevada Parent Teacher Association.
(h) One member who is a representative of the public at large,
appointed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.
(i) One member who owns or manages a business located in
this State, appointed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.
Sec. 39. NRS 385.021 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385.021 1. The State Board of Education is hereby created.
The State Board consists of the following voting members:
(a) One member elected by the registered voters of [each] the
congressional [district described] districts designated as
Congressional District 1 and Congressional District 2 in the
shapefile adopted by NRS 304.095;
(b) One member elected by the registered voters of the
congressional districts designated as Congressional District 3 and
Congressional District 4 in the shapefile adopted by NRS 304.095;
(c) One member appointed by the Governor;
[(c)] (d) One member appointed by the Governor, nominated by
the Majority Leader of the Senate; and
[(d)] (e) One member appointed by the Governor, nominated by
the Speaker of the Assembly.
2. In addition to the voting members described in subsection 1,
the State Board consists of the following four nonvoting members:
(a) One member appointed by the Governor who is a member of
a board of trustees of a school district, nominated by the Nevada
Association of School Boards;
(b) One member appointed by the Governor who is the
superintendent of schools of a school district, nominated by the
Nevada Association of School Superintendents;
(c) One member appointed by the Governor who represents the
Nevada System of Higher Education, nominated by the Board of
Regents of the University of Nevada; and
(d) One member appointed by the Governor who is a pupil
enrolled in a public school in this State, nominated by the Nevada
Association of Student Councils or its successor organization and in
consultation with the Nevada Youth Legislature. After the initial
term, the term of the member appointed pursuant to this paragraph
commences on June 1 and expires on May 31 of the following year.
-
*SB78*

– 36 –
3. Each member of the State Board elected pursuant to
[paragraph] paragraphs (a) or (b) of subsection 1 must be a
qualified elector of [the] either congressional district from which
that member is elected.
4. Each member appointed pursuant to paragraphs [(b),] (c) ,
[and] (d) and (e) of subsection 1 and each member appointed
pursuant to subsection 2 must be a resident of this State.
5. Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (a) and (c) of
subsection 2, a person who is elected to serve as an officer of this
State or any political subdivision thereof or a person appointed to
serve for the unexpired term of such an office may not serve or
continue to serve on the State Board.
6. The Governor shall ensure that the members appointed
pursuant to paragraphs [(b),] (c) , [and] (d) and (e) of subsection 1
represent the geographic diversity of this State and that:
(a) One member is a teacher at a public school selected from a
list of three candidates provided by the Nevada State Education
Association.
(b) One member is the parent or legal guardian of a pupil
enrolled in a public school.
(c) One member is a person active in a private business or
industry of this State.
7. After the initial terms, each member:
(a) Elected pursuant to paragraph (a) or (b) of subsection 1
serves a term of 4 years. A member may be elected to serve not
more than three terms but may be appointed to serve pursuant to
paragraph [(b),] (c) , [or] (d) or (e) of subsection 1 or subsection 2
after service as an elected member, notwithstanding the number of
terms the member served as an elected member.
(b) Appointed pursuant to paragraphs [(b),] (c) , [and] (d) and
(e) of subsection 1 serves a term of 2 years, except that each
member continues to serve until a successor is appointed. A member
may be reappointed for additional terms of 2 years in the same
manner as the original appointment.
(c) Appointed pursuant to subsection 2 serves a term of 1 year.
A member may be reappointed for additional terms of 1 year in the
same manner as the original appointment.
8. If a vacancy occurs during the term of:
(a) A member who was elected pursuant to paragraph (a) or (b)
of subsection 1, the Governor shall appoint a member to fill the
vacancy until the next general election, at which election a member
must be chosen for the balance of the unexpired term. The appointee
must be a qualified elector of [the] either congressional district
where the vacancy occurs.
-
*SB78*

– 37 –
(b) A voting member appointed pursuant to paragraph [(b),] (c) ,
[or] (d) or (e) of subsection 1 or a nonvoting member appointed
pursuant to subsection 2, the vacancy must be filled in the same
manner as the original appointment for the remainder of the
unexpired term.
Sec. 40. NRS 385.610 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385.610 1. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall
establish an Advisory Council for Family Engagement. The
Advisory Council is composed of [11] seven members.
2. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall appoint the
following members to the Advisory Council:
(a) Two parents or legal guardians of pupils enrolled in public
schools;
(b) [Two teachers] One teacher in a public [schools;] school;
(c) One administrator of a public school;
(d) [One representative of a private business or industry;
(e)] One member of the board of trustees of a school district in a
county whose population is 100,000 or more;
[(f)] (e) One member of the board of trustees of a school district
in a county whose population is less than 100,000; and
[(g)] (f) One member who is the President of the Board of
Managers of the Nevada Parent Teacher Association or its successor
organization, or a designee nominated by the President.
 The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall, to the extent
practicable, ensure that the members the Superintendent appoints to
the Advisory Council reflect the ethnic, economic and geographic
diversity of this State.
3. [The Speaker of the Assembly shall appoint one member of
the Assembly to the Advisory Council.
4. The Majority Leader of the Senate shall appoint one member
of the Senate to the Advisory Council.
5.] The Advisory Council shall elect a Chair and Vice Chair
from among its members. The Chair and Vice Chair serve a term of
1 year.
[6.] 4. After the initial terms [:
(a) The] , the term of each member of the Advisory Council
[who is appointed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction is 3
years.
(b) The term of each member of the Advisory Council who is
appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly and the Majority Leader
of the Senate] is 2 years. A member may not serve more than two
terms.
[7.] 5. The Advisory Council shall, at least 30 days before the
beginning of any member’s term, or within 30 days after a position
on the Advisory Council becomes vacant, submit to the [relevant
-
*SB78*

– 38 –
appointing authority, as set forth in subsection 2, 3 or 4, as
applicable,] Superintendent of Public Instruction the names of at
least three persons qualified for membership on the Advisory
Council.
[8. The]
6. Except as otherwise provided in section 11 of this act, the
Department shall provide:
(a) Administrative support to the Advisory Council; and
(b) All information that is necessary for the Advisory Council to
carry out its duties.
[9. For each day or portion of a day during which a member of
the Advisory Council who is a Legislator attends a meeting of the
Advisory Council or is otherwise engaged in the business of the
Advisory Council, except during a regular or special session of
the Legislature, the member is entitled to receive the:
(a) Compensation provided for a majority of the members of the
Legislature during the first 60 days of the preceding regular session;
(b) Per diem allowance provided for state officers generally; and
(c) Travel expenses provided pursuant to NRS 218A.655.
 The compensation, per diem allowances and travel expenses of
the legislative members of the Advisory Council must be paid from
the Legislative Fund.
10.] 7. A member of the Advisory Council [who is not a
Legislator] is entitled to receive the per diem allowance and travel
expenses provided for state officers and employees generally for
each day or portion of a day during which the member attends a
meeting of the Advisory Council or is otherwise engaged in the
business of the Advisory Council. The per diem allowance and
travel expenses for the members of the Advisory Council [who are
not Legislators] must be paid by the Department.
[11.] 8. Any costs associated with employing a substitute
teacher while a member of the Advisory Council who is a teacher
attends a meeting of the Advisory Council must be paid by the
school district or charter school that employs the member.
Sec. 41. NRS 385.760 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385.760 1. The Nevada Commission on Mentoring is hereby
created. The Commission consists of the following [13] seven
members:
(a) One member appointed by the [Governor] Superintendent of
Public Instruction who is a representative of business and industry
with a vested interest in supporting mentorship programs in this
State.
(b) One member appointed by the [Governor] Superintendent of
Public Instruction who represents an employment and training
organization located in this State.
-
*SB78*

– 39 –
(c) [One member appointed by the Governor who is a resident
of a county whose population is less than 100,000.
(d)] One member appointed by the Superintendent of Public
Instruction who is the superintendent of a school district in a county
whose population is 700,000 or more.
[(e)] (d) One member appointed by the Superintendent of
Public Instruction who is the superintendent of a school district in a
county whose population is 100,000 or more but less than 700,000.
[(f)] (e) One member, who is not a Legislator, appointed by the
Majority Leader of the Senate.
[(g)] (f) One member, who is not a Legislator, appointed by the
Speaker of the Assembly.
[(h) One member, who is not a Legislator, appointed by the
Minority Leader of the Senate.
(i) One member, who is not a Legislator, appointed by the
Minority Leader of the Assembly.
(j) Four members]
(g) One member appointed [to the Commission pursuant to
subsection 2.
2. The] by the members of the Commission appointed pursuant
to paragraphs (a) to [(i),] (f), inclusive, [of subsection 1 shall, at the
first meeting of the Commission, appoint to the Commission four
additional voting members:
(a) One of whom must be a member of the state advisory group
appointed by the Governor pursuant to 34 U.S.C. § 11133 and
operating in this State as the Juvenile Justice Commission under the
Division of Child and Family Services of the Department of Health
and Human Services;
(b) One of whom must be a representative of business and
industry with a vested interest in supporting mentorship programs in
this State; and
(c) Two members] who is between the ages of 16 years and 24
years and who [have] has a vested interest in supporting mentorship
programs in this State.
[3.] 2. After the initial terms, each member of the Commission
appointed pursuant to [subsections] subsection 1 [and 2] serves a
term of 2 years. A member of the Commission may be reappointed,
except that no member may serve more than two [consecutive]
terms.
[4.] 3. Any vacancy occurring in the membership of the
Commission must be filled in the same manner as the original
appointment not later than 30 days after the vacancy occurs. A
member appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve as a member of the
Commission for the remainder of the original term of appointment.
-
*SB78*

– 40 –
[5.] 4. If a member of the Commission fails to attend two
consecutive meetings of the Commission, the Commission shall,
within 5 days after the second consecutive meeting that the member
fails to attend, provide notice of that fact, in writing, to the
appointing authority who appointed that member. Upon receipt of
the notice, the appointing authority shall appoint a person to replace
the member in the same manner as filling a vacancy on the
Commission pursuant to subsection [4.] 3.
[6.] 5. Each member of the Commission:
(a) Serves without compensation; and
(b) While engaged in the business of the Commission, is entitled
to receive the per diem allowance and travel expenses provided for
state officers and employees generally.
[7. The]
6. Except as otherwise provided in section 11 of this act, the
Department shall provide the Commission with such administrative
support as is necessary to assist the Commission in carrying out its
duties pursuant to NRS 385.780.
Sec. 42. NRS 387.1246 is hereby amended to read as follows:
387.1246 1. The Commission on School Funding, consisting
of [11] seven members, is hereby created.
2. The Commission consists of the following members, who
may not be Legislators:
(a) One member appointed by the [Governor,] Superintendent
of Public Instruction, who serves as Chair;
(b) [Two members] One member appointed by the Majority
Leader of the Senate;
(c) [Two members] One member appointed by the Speaker of
the Assembly;
(d) One member appointed by the Minority Leader of the
Senate;
(e) One member appointed by the Minority Leader of the
Assembly;
(f) [Two members] One member appointed by the [Governor,
each of whom] Superintendent of Public Instruction, who is the
chief financial officer of a school district in this State which has
more than 40,000 pupils enrolled in its public schools, nominated by
the Nevada Association of School Superintendents or its successor
organization; and
(g) [Two members] One member, appointed by the [Governor,
each of whom] Superintendent of Public Instruction, who is the
chief financial officer of a school district in this State which has
40,000 or fewer pupils enrolled in its public schools, nominated by
the Nevada Association of School Superintendents or its successor
organization.
-
*SB78*

– 41 –
 In making appointments to the Commission, the appointing
authorities shall consider whether the membership generally reflects
the geographic distribution of pupils in the State.
3. Each member of the Commission must:
(a) Be a resident of this State;
(b) Not have been registered as a lobbyist pursuant to NRS
218H.200 for a period of at least 2 years immediately preceding
appointment to the Commission;
(c) Have relevant experience in public education;
(d) Have relevant experience in fiscal policy, school finance or
similar or related financial activities;
(e) Have the education, experience and skills necessary to
effectively execute the duties and responsibilities of a member of
the Commission; and
(f) Have demonstrated ability in the field of economics, taxation
or other discipline necessary to school finance and be able to bring
knowledge and professional judgment to the deliberations of the
Commission.
4. Each member of the Commission serves a term of [3] 2
years and may be reappointed [to additional] , except that a member
may not serve more than two terms.
5. Each member may be removed by the appointing authority
for good cause. A vacancy on the Commission must be filled in the
same manner as the original appointment.
6. The Commission shall:
(a) Elect a Vice Chair from among its members at its first
meeting for a term of [3] 2 years. A vacancy in the office of Vice
Chair must be filled by the Commission by election for the
remainder of the existing term.
(b) Adopt such rules governing the conduct of the Commission
as it deems necessary.
[(c) Meet at least once each month and hold such number of
meetings as may be necessary to accomplish the tasks assigned to it.
(d) Meet in person or, at the discretion of the Chair in
consultation with the Superintendent of Public Instruction based on
the items on the agenda for a meeting, by use of a remote
technology system, as defined in NRS 241.015.]
7. A majority of the members of the Commission constitutes a
quorum and a majority of those present must concur in any decision.
8. [The] Except as otherwise provided in section 11 of this
act, the Department shall provide the Commission with meeting
rooms, data processing services and administrative and clerical
assistance and undertake any research, analysis, study or other work
required by the Commission to carry out its duties pursuant to NRS
387.12463. [The] Except as otherwise provided in section 11 of this
-
*SB78*

– 42 –
act, the Superintendent of Public Instruction and Office of Finance
shall jointly provide the Commission with professional staff
services.
9. While engaged in the business of the Commission, each
member is entitled to receive the per diem allowance and travel
expenses provided for state officers and employees generally.
10. The Commission may meet only:
(a) Between July 1 of an odd-numbered year and December 31
of the subsequent even-numbered year; or
(b) During any regular or special session of the Legislature, if
requested to do so by the chair of the:
(1) Senate Standing Committee on Education;
(2) Assembly Standing Committee on Education;
(3) Senate Standing Committee on Finance;
(4) Assembly Standing Committee on Ways and Means; or
(5) Interim Finance Committee.
Sec. 43. Chapter 388 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Advisory Committee on School and Staff Safety is
hereby created within the Department.
2. The Committee consists of:
(a) The State Fire Marshal.
(b) The Director of the Office for a Safe and Respectful
Learning Environment.
(c) The following members appointed by the Superintendent of
Public Instruction:
(1) Two members who are licensed pursuant to chapter 391
of NRS, employed by a school district in this State and teach in the
classroom.
(2) One member who is an administrator of an elementary
school or high school in this State.
(3) One member who is the superintendent of a school
district in this State.
(4) One member who is a school psychologist employed by
a school in this State.
(5) One member who is the parent or legal guardian of a
pupil enrolled in a school in this State.
(6) One member who is a school resource officer assigned
to a school in this State.
Sec. 44. NRS 388.1326 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.1326 1. The Committee on Responses to Power-Based
Violence in Schools is hereby created within the Department.
2. The Committee consists of the following members,
appointed by the chair of the committee on statewide school safety
created pursuant to NRS 388.1324:
-
*SB78*

– 43 –
(a) Two members who are representatives of a nonprofit
organization that assists victims of power-based violence;
(b) One member who is the parent of a pupil who identifies as a
victim of power-based violence;
(c) One member who is a pupil who identifies as a victim of
power-based violence;
(d) [Two members] One member who [are] is a Title IX
[coordinators] coordinator for a public [schools] school in this
State;
(e) One member who is an employee of the Office for a Safe and
Respectful Learning Environment;
(f) One member who is a school resource officer assigned to a
school in this State;
(g) [One member who is employed as a school psychologist at a
school in this State;
(h)] One member who is a licensed teacher in this State;
[(i)] and
(h) One member who is employed as a school social worker at a
school in this State . [;
(j) One member who is an administrator of a school in this State;
and
(k) One member who is the superintendent of a school district in
this State.]
3. Any vacancy occurring in the membership of the Committee
must be filled in the same manner as the original appointment not
later than 30 days after the vacancy occurs.
4. The Committee shall elect a Chair and Vice Chair from
among its members at the first meeting of the Committee and at the
first meeting of the calendar year each year thereafter. The Chair
and Vice Chair serve a term of 1 year.
5. Each member of the Committee serves a term of 2 years and
may be reappointed [.] , except that a member may not serve more
than two terms.
6. A majority of the members of the Committee constitutes a
quorum for the transaction of business, and a majority of a quorum
present at any meeting is sufficient for any official action taken by
the Committee.
7. The Committee shall review, study and make
recommendations regarding power-based violence in schools. In
performing its duties, the Committee shall:
(a) Consider the experiences of pupils relating to power-based
violence and pupil safety;
(b) Examine current procedures and protocols for responding to
power-based violence that are used in public schools in this State;
-
*SB78*

– 44 –
(c) Identify emerging trends and best practices for responding to
and preventing power-based violence;
(d) Identify possible gaps in the services that are available for
victims of power-based violence; and
(e) Make recommendations for procedures that will focus on
preventing and intervening in disclosures of power-based violence.
8. The Committee shall, not later than August 1 of each odd-
numbered year, submit to the Joint Interim Standing Committee on
Education any recommendations for legislation relating to power-
based violence in schools.
9. The members of the Committee serve without compensation
but are entitled to receive the per diem allowance and travel
expenses provided for state officers and employees generally.
10. A member of the Committee who is an officer or employee
of this State or a political subdivision of this State must be relieved
from his or her duties without loss of regular compensation to
prepare for and attend meetings of the Committee and perform any
work necessary to carry out the duties of the Committee in the most
timely manner practicable. A state agency or political subdivision of
this State shall not require an officer or employee who is a member
of the Committee to:
(a) Make up the time he or she is absent from work to carry out
his or her duties as a member of the Committee; or
(b) Take annual leave or compensatory time for the absence.
11. As used in this section, “power-based violence” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 396.1285.
Sec. 45. NRS 388.5175 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.5175 1. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall
establish within the Department the Advisory Committee on
Language Development for Children Who Are Deaf, Hard of
Hearing, Blind or Visually Impaired.
2. The Superintendent shall appoint to the Committee [13] nine
members who are the parents of pupils who are deaf, hard of
hearing, blind or visually impaired, including, without limitation,
pupils who are both deaf and blind, specialize in teaching or
providing services to such children or perform research in a field
relating to such children. The Committee must [include, without
limitation:] consist of:
(a) [At least seven] Five members who are deaf, hard of hearing,
blind or visually impaired;
(b) [Members] Two members who communicate verbally using
both American Sign Language and spoken English; and
(c) [Members] Two members who communicate verbally using
only spoken English.
-
*SB78*

– 45 –
3. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall appoint a
Chair of the Committee. [The Committee shall meet at the call of
the Chair.] A majority of the members of the Committee constitutes
a quorum and is required to transact any business of the Committee.
4. The members of the Committee serve without compensation
[and are not] but are entitled to receive the per diem allowance and
travel expenses provided for state officers and employees generally.
5. A member of the Committee who is an officer or employee
of this State or a political subdivision of this State must be relieved
from his or her duties without loss of regular compensation to
prepare for and attend meetings of the Committee and perform any
work necessary to carry out the duties of the Committee in the most
timely manner practicable. A state agency or political subdivision of
this State shall not require an officer or employee who is a member
of the Committee to:
(a) Make up the time he or she is absent from work to carry out
his or her duties as a member of the Committee; or
(b) Take annual leave or compensatory time for the absence.
Sec. 46. NRS 388.5966 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.5966 1. The State Financial Literacy Advisory Council is
hereby created. The Council consists of:
(a) [The following ex officio members:
(1) The Superintendent of Public Instruction or his or her
designee; and
(2) The Chancellor of the Nevada System of Higher
Education or his or her designee;
(b) Three] Two members appointed by the [Governor;
(c) Two members]
Superintendent of Public Instruction;
(b) One member appointed by the Majority Leader of the
Senate;
[(d) Two members]
(c) One member appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly;
[(e)] (d) One member appointed by the Minority Leader of the
Senate;
[(f)] (e) One member appointed by the Minority Leader of the
Assembly; and
[(g)] (f) One member appointed by the Chancellor of the
Nevada System of Higher Education who has a background in
economics or financial literacy.
2. The [Governor,] Superintendent of Public Instruction, the
Majority Leader and the Minority Leader of the Senate, the Speaker
and Minority Leader of the Assembly and the Chancellor of the
Nevada System of Higher Education shall coordinate their
respective appointments of members to the Council to ensure that, to
-
*SB78*

– 46 –
the extent practicable, the members appointed to the Council reflect
the gender, ethnic and geographic diversity of this State and that:
(a) [Three members of the Council are members of the business
community with a background in economics;
(b)] One member of the Council is a member of the business
community who is employed in the banking industry;
[(c)] (b) One member of the Council is a member of the
business community who is employed by a credit union;
[(d)] (c) Three members of the Council are teachers who hold a
license to teach elementary, middle or junior high school or
secondary education, respectively, and who:
(1) Teach in an elementary, middle or junior high or high
school, respectively;
(2) Have received training in financial literacy; and
(3) Are responsible for teaching courses relating to financial
literacy;
[(e)] (d) One member of the Council is an administrator of a
public school; and
[(f)] (e) One member of the Council is an administrator of a
school district.
3. Any vacancy occurring in the membership of the Council
must be filled in the same manner as the original appointment not
later than 30 days after the vacancy occurs.
4. The Council shall elect a Chair and Vice Chair from among
its members at the first meeting of the Council and at the first
meeting of the calendar year each year thereafter. The Chair and
Vice Chair serve a term of 1 year.
5. Each member of the Council serves a term of 2 years and
may be reappointed [.] , except that a member may not serve more
than two terms.
6. [The Council shall meet at least four times a year at the call
of the Chair. One meeting of the Council must be held in person and
any other meeting may be held by videoconference.
7.] A majority of the members of the Council constitutes a
quorum for the transaction of business, and a majority of those
members present at any meeting is sufficient for any official action
taken by the Council.
[8.] 7. The Chair may appoint such subcommittees of the
Council as the Chair determines necessary to carry out the duties of
the Council.
[9.] 8. The members of the Council serve without
compensation, except that each member is entitled to receive the per
diem allowance and travel expenses provided for state officers and
employees generally while engaged in the official business of the
Council.
-
*SB78*

– 47 –
[10.] 9. Each member of the Council who is an officer or
employee of the State or a local government must be relieved from
his or her duties without loss of his or her regular compensation so
that the member may prepare for and attend meetings of the Council
and perform any work necessary to carry out the duties of the
Council in the most timely manner practicable. A state agency or
local government shall not require an officer or employee who is a
member of the Council to make up the time the member is absent
from work to carry out his or her duties as a member, and shall not
require the member to take annual vacation or compensatory time
for the absence.
[11.] 10. Any costs associated with employing a substitute
teacher while a member of the Council who is a teacher attends a
meeting of the Council must be paid by the school district that
employs the member.
[12. To]
11. Except as otherwise provided in section 11 of this act, to
the extent that money is available, the Department shall provide
administrative support to the Council.
Sec. 47. NRS 388F.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388F.020 1. In furtherance of the provisions contained in the
Interstate Compact on Educational Opportunity for Military
Children, there is hereby created a State Council for the
Coordination of the Interstate Compact on Educational Opportunity
for Military Children, consisting of the following members:
(a) One representative of the Nevada National Guard, appointed
by the [Governor.] Superintendent of Public Instruction.
(b) One representative of each military installation in this State,
appointed by the commanding officer of that military installation.
(c) The Superintendent of Public Instruction.
(d) [The superintendent] Two members who are
superintendents of [each] a school district in which a military
installation is located [.] , appointed by the Superintendent of
Public Instruction.
(e) One Legislator or other person appointed by the Legislative
Commission to represent the interests of the Legislature.
(f) One person appointed by the [Governor to represent the
interests of the Governor.] Superintendent of Public Instruction.
2. A member of the State Council serves a term of 2 years and
until his or her successor is appointed. A member may be
reappointed [.] but may not serve more than two terms.
3. A member of the State Council may be removed from office
by the appointing authority at any time.
4. A vacancy on the State Council must be filled in the same
manner as the original appointment.
-
*SB78*

– 48 –
5. The members of the State Council serve without
compensation [and] but are [not] entitled to [any] receive the per
diem [or] allowance and travel expenses [.
6. The State Council shall meet at least twice per year, with at
least one meeting held before the beginning of each school semester,
and may meet at other times upon the call of the Commissioner
appointed pursuant to NRS 388F.040.] provided for state officers
and employees generally.
Sec. 48. Chapter 391 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Nevada Commission on Professional Standards and
Regional Education Training, consisting of nine members
appointed by the Governor, is hereby created within the
Department.
2. The Governor shall appoint to the Commission:
(a) One member who holds a license to teach secondary
education and teaches in a secondary school.
(b) One member who holds a license to teach elementary
education and teaches in an elementary school.
(c) One member who holds a license to teach special education
and teaches special education.
(d) One member who is a school counselor, school
psychologist or other specialist who is licensed pursuant to this
chapter and employed by a school district or charter school.
(e) One member who is an administrator of a school who is
employed by a school district or charter school to provide
administrative service at an individual school. Such an
administrator must not provide service at the district level.
(f) One member who is the parent or legal guardian of a pupil
enrolled in a public school.
(g) One member who is the superintendent of schools of a
school district.
(h) Two members who represent the broader public interest or
other critical viewpoints.
Sec. 49. NRS 391.455 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.455 1. There is hereby created the Teachers and Leaders
Council of Nevada consisting of the following [16] nine members:
(a) The Superintendent of Public Instruction, or his or her
designee, who serves as an ex officio member of the Council.
(b) The Chancellor of the Nevada System of Higher Education,
or his or her designee, who serves as an ex officio member of the
Council.
(c) [Four teachers] One teacher in a public [schools] school
appointed by the [Governor] Superintendent of Public Instruction
from a list of nominees submitted by the Nevada State Education
-
*SB78*

– 49 –
Association. [The members appointed pursuant to this paragraph
must represent the geographical diversity of the school districts in
this State.]
(d) One school counselor, psychologist, speech-language
pathologist, audiologist or social worker who is licensed pursuant to
chapter 391 of NRS appointed by the [Governor] Superintendent of
Public Instruction from a list of nominees submitted by the Nevada
State Education Association. [The persons nominated pursuant to
this paragraph must represent the geographical diversity of school
districts in this State.]
(e) [Two administrators] One administrator in a public
[schools] school appointed by the [Governor] Superintendent of
Public Instruction from a list of nominees submitted by the Nevada
Association of School Administrators . [and one superintendent of
schools of a school district appointed by the Governor from a list of
nominees submitted by the Nevada Association of School
Superintendents. The members appointed pursuant to this paragraph
must represent the geographical diversity of the school districts in
this State.]
(f) [Two persons] One person who [are members] is a member
of [boards] the board of trustees of a school [districts] district and
who [are] is appointed by the [Governor] Superintendent of Public
Instruction from a list of nominees submitted by the Nevada
Association of School Boards.
(g) One representative of the regional training programs for the
professional development of teachers and administrators created by
NRS 391A.120 appointed by the [Governor] Superintendent of
Public Instruction from a list of nominees submitted by the Nevada
Association of School Superintendents.
(h) One parent or legal guardian of a pupil enrolled in public
school appointed by the [Governor] Superintendent of Public
Instruction from a list of nominees submitted by the Nevada Parent
Teacher Association.
(i) [Two persons] One person with expertise in the development
of public policy relating to education appointed by the
Superintendent of Public Instruction. The [members] member
appointed pursuant to this paragraph must not otherwise be eligible
for appointment pursuant to paragraphs (a) to (h), inclusive.
2. After the initial terms, each appointed member of the
Council serves a term of [3] 2 years commencing on July 1 and may
be reappointed to one additional [3-year] 2-year term following his
or her initial term. If any appointed member of the Council ceases to
be qualified for the position to which he or she was appointed, the
position shall be deemed vacant and the appointing authority shall
appoint a replacement for the remainder of the unexpired term. A
-
*SB78*

– 50 –
vacancy must be filled in the same manner as the original
appointment.
3. The Council shall, at its first meeting and annually
thereafter, elect a Chair from among its members.
4. [The Council shall meet at least semiannually and may meet
at other times upon the call of the Chair or a majority of the
members of the Council.] Nine members of the Council constitute a
quorum, and a quorum may exercise all the power and authority
conferred on the Council.
5. Members of the Council serve without compensation, except
that for each day or portion of a day during which a member of the
Council attends a meeting of the Council or is otherwise engaged in
the business of the Council, the member is entitled to receive the per
diem allowance and travel expenses provided for state officers and
employees generally.
6. A member of the Council who is a public employee must be
granted administrative leave from the member’s duties to engage in
the business of the Council without loss of his or her regular
compensation. Such leave does not reduce the amount of the
member’s other accrued leave.
7. Any costs associated with employing a substitute teacher
while a member of the Council who is a teacher attends a meeting of
the Council must be:
(a) Paid by the school district or charter school that employs the
member; or
(b) Reimbursed to the school district or charter school that
employs the member by the organization that submitted the name of
the member to the [Governor] Superintendent of Public Instruction
for appointment pursuant to paragraph (c), (d), (e), (f), (g) or (h) of
subsection 1.
8. [The] Except as otherwise provided in section 11 of this
act, the Department shall provide administrative support to the
Council.
9. The Council may apply for and accept gifts, grants,
donations and contributions from any source for the purpose of
carrying out its duties pursuant to NRS 391.460.
Sec. 50. NRS 394.383 is hereby amended to read as follows:
394.383 1. The Commission on Postsecondary Education is
hereby created within the [Employment Security Division of the]
Department of [Employment, Training and Rehabilitation.]
Business and Industry. The Commission consists of:
(a) An employee of the Department of [Employment, Training
and Rehabilitation] Business and Industry designated by the
Director of the Department of [Employment, Training and
-
*SB78*

– 51 –
Rehabilitation] Business and Industry to serve as a nonvoting
member; and
(b) Seven voting members appointed by the Governor.
2. The voting members of the Commission are entitled to
receive a salary of not more than [$80,] $150, as fixed by the
[Commission,] Deputy Director of the Office of Nevada Boards,
Commissions and Councils Standards of the Department of
Business and Industry and approved by the Director of the
Department of Business and Industry for each day’s attendance at
a meeting of the Commission.
3. The nonvoting member of the Commission designated
pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1 must be relieved from his
or her duties with the Department of [Employment, Training and
Rehabilitation] Business and Industry without loss of regular
compensation so that he or she may prepare for and attend meetings
of the Commission and perform any work necessary to carry out the
duties of the Commission in the most timely manner practicable.
The Department may not require the member to make up time or
take annual vacation or compensatory time for the time that he or
she is absent from work to carry out his or her duties as a member of
the Commission.
4. While engaged in the business of the Commission, each
member of the Commission is entitled to receive [the] a per diem
allowance and travel expenses at a rate fixed by the Deputy
Director of the Office of Nevada Boards, Commissions and
Councils Standards of the Department of Business and Industry
and approved by the Director of the Department of Business and
Industry. The rate must not exceed the rate provided for state
officers and employees generally.
Sec. 51. Chapter 407A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The State Outdoor Recreation and Education Advisory
Council is hereby created within the Department.
2. The Council consists of:
(a) The Administrator of the Division of State Parks of the
Department.
(b) The Chair of the Nevada Indian Commission.
(c) Seven members appointed by the Director as follows:
(1) One member who is a representative of the Division of
Outdoor Recreation of the Department.
(2) One member who is a representative of the Department
of Wildlife.
(3) One member who is a teacher.
(4) One member who is a nature-based education provider.
-
*SB78*

– 52 –
(5) One member who is a representative of the outdoor
recreation industry.
(6) One member who is a representative of the United
States Department of the Interior from the Bureau of Land
Management, National Park Service or United States Fish and
Wildlife Service.
(7) One member who is a representative of the United
States Department of Agriculture from the United States Forest
Service or Rural Development.
Sec. 52. Chapter 414 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Nevada Emergency Response and Disaster
Coordination Board is hereby created.
2. The Board consists of:
(a) The Chief, who serves as Chair of the Board; and
(b) The following members appointed by the Chief:
(1) One member who is a representative of the Nevada
National Guard;
(2) One member who is a representative of the Nevada
Sheriffs’ and Chiefs’ Association or its legal successor;
(3) One member who is a representative of a tribal
government;
(4) One member who is a representative of the Division of
Forestry of the State Department of Conservation and Natural
Resources;
(5) One member who is a representative of the Division of
Public and Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and
Human Services;
(6) One member who is a representative of the Nevada Fire
Chiefs Association or its legal successor;
(7) One member who is a representative of the Nevada
Hospital Association or its legal successor; and
(8) One member who is a representative of a county
coroner’s office.
Sec. 53. NRS 417.0191 is hereby amended to read as follows:
417.0191 1. The Interagency Council on Veterans Affairs is
hereby created. The Council consists of:
(a) The Director of the Department of Business and Industry;
(b) [The Director of the Department of Corrections;
(c)] The Director of the Department of Employment, Training
and Rehabilitation;
[(d)] (c) The Director of the Department of Health and Human
Services;
[(e) The Director of the Department of Public Safety;
(f)] (d) The Director of the Department of Veterans Services;
-
*SB78*

– 53 –
[(g)] (e) The Adjutant General;
[(h)] (f) The Chancellor of the Nevada System of Higher
Education;
[(i)] (g) The Executive Director of the Office of Economic
Development;
[(j)] (h) The Executive Director of the Department of Native
American Affairs;
[(k) The Administrator of the Division of Human Resource
Management of the Department of Administration;
(l) The Attorney General;
(m) The Superintendent of Public Instruction;
(n) The Executive Director of the Governor’s Office of
Workforce Innovation; and
(o) Any other persons]
(i) One member appointed by the [Governor, including,]
Director, who may be, without limitation, [representatives] a
representative of a federal [and] or local governmental [agencies
and] agency or private [entities] entity that [provide] provides
services to veterans. [Members] The member appointed pursuant to
this paragraph [serve] serves at the pleasure of the [Governor.]
Director.
2. A member of the Council may designate a person to
represent him or her at any meeting of the Council. The person
designated may exercise all the duties, rights and privileges of the
member that he or she represents.
Sec. 54. NRS 417.150 is hereby amended to read as follows:
417.150 1. The Nevada Veterans Services Commission,
consisting of [11] seven members, is hereby created.
2. The [Governor] Director shall appoint:
(a) Three members who are representatives of veterans’
organizations recognized nationally or in this State and who possess
honorable discharges from some branch of the Armed Forces of the
United States.
(b) One member who is a member of the Women Veterans
Advisory Committee created by NRS 417.320.
(c) One member who is [enrolled as a student at an institution of
higher education in this State in a program for a baccalaureate or
higher degree and who possesses an honorable discharge from some
branch of the Armed Forces of the United States.
(d) Two members who are representatives] a representative of
the general public.
3. The Chair of the Advisory Committee for a Veterans
Cemetery in Northern Nevada and the Chair of the Advisory
Committee for a Veterans Cemetery in Southern Nevada shall each
appoint one member from their respective committees to serve as a
-
*SB78*

– 54 –
member of the Commission. Each member so appointed must be a
representative of a veterans’ organization recognized nationally or
in this State and possess an honorable discharge from some branch
of the Armed Forces of the United States.
4. [The Majority Leader of the Senate shall appoint one
member of the Senate to serve as a member of the Commission.
5. The Speaker of the Assembly shall appoint one member of
the Assembly to serve as a member of the Commission.
6.] The [Governor] Director may remove a member of the
Commission at any time for failure to perform his or her duties,
malfeasance or other good cause.
[7.] 5. The term of office of each member is [3] 2 years.
[8. If a vacancy occurs in the membership of those members
appointed pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 2, the Governor
shall fill the vacancy from among the names of qualified nominees
provided to the Governor in writing by the Director.] A member
may not serve more than two terms.
Sec. 55. Chapter 422 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Beneficiary Advisory Council is hereby created within
the Division to advise the Director on matters of concern related to
policy development and matters related to the effective
administration of the Medicaid program and carry out any other
duties imposed on a Beneficiary Advisory Council by 42 C.F.R.
§ 431.12.
2. The Director shall appoint such number of members of the
Council as he or she determines is appropriate to carry out the
duties of the Council. The Council must consist of persons who
are currently or have been Medicaid beneficiaries and persons
with direct experience supporting Medicaid beneficiaries,
including, without limitation, a family member of a Medicaid
beneficiary and a paid or unpaid caregiver of a person enrolled in
Medicaid.
3. A member of the Beneficiary Advisory Council serves a
term of 2 years. A member may not serve:
(a) More than two terms; and
(b) Two consecutive terms.
Sec. 56. NRS 422.151 is hereby amended to read as follows:
422.151 1. The [Medical Care] Medicaid Advisory
Committee is hereby created within the Division.
2. The function of the [Medical Care] Medicaid Advisory
Committee is to:
(a) Advise the Division regarding the provision of services for
the health and medical care of welfare recipients.
-
*SB78*

– 55 –
(b) Participate, and increase the participation of welfare
recipients, in the development of policy and the administration of
programs by the Division.
(c) Advise the Director on matters of concern related to policy
development and matters related to the effective administration of
the Medicaid program and carry out any other duties imposed on
a Medicaid Advisory Committee by 42 C.F.R. § 431.12.
(d) Carry out the duties set forth in NRS 422.205.
Sec. 57. NRS 422.153 is hereby amended to read as follows:
422.153 1. The [Medical Care] Medicaid Advisory
Committee consists of [the Chief Medical Officer and:] nine
members as follows:
(a) [A person who:
(1) Holds a license to practice medicine in this state; and
(2) Is certified by the Board of Medical Examiners in a
medical specialty.] The Administrator, who serves as an ex officio,
nonvoting member.
(b) [A person who holds a license to practice dentistry in this
state.] Two officers or employees of an agency in the Executive
Department of the State Government that serves Medicaid
beneficiaries, who serve as ex officio, nonvoting members.
(c) [A person who holds a certificate of registration as a
pharmacist in this state.
(d) A member of a profession in the field of health care who is
familiar with the needs of persons of low income, the resources
required for their care and the availability of those resources.
(e) An administrator of a hospital or a clinic for health care.
(f) An administrator of a facility for intermediate care or a
facility for skilled nursing.
(g) A member of an organized group that provides assistance,
representation or other support to recipients of] Six voting members,
appointed by the Director as follows:
(1) The following number of members who are also
members of the Beneficiary Advisory Council within the Division
created by section 55 of this act:
(I) During the period beginning on July 1, 2025, and
ending on July 9, 2026, one member.
(II) During the period beginning on July 10, 2026, and
ending on July 10, 2027, two members.
(III) After July 10, 2027, three members.
(2) At least one member who is a representative of a state or
local consumer advocacy group or other community-based
organization that represents the interests of, or provides direct
service to, Medicaid [.
(h) A recipient of] beneficiaries.
-
*SB78*

– 56 –
(3) At least one member who is a representative of clinical
providers or administrators, including, without limitation,
providers of administrators of primary care, specialty care or long-
term care, who is familiar with the health and social needs of
Medicaid [.] beneficiaries.
(4) At least one member who is a representative of a
participating Medicaid managed care organization, prepaid
inpatient health plan, prepaid ambulatory health plan, primary
care case management entity or primary care case manager, as
those terms are defined in 42 C.F.R. § 438.2, or a health plan
association representing more than one such plan.
2. [The] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the
Director shall appoint each member required by subsection 1 to
serve for a term of 2 years. The Director may appoint a member to
a shorter term to satisfy the requirements of subsection 1. A
member may not serve:
(a) More than two terms; and
(b) Two consecutive terms.
3. Members of the [Medical Care] Medicaid Advisory
Committee serve without compensation, except that while engaged
in the business of the Advisory Committee, each member is entitled
to receive the per diem allowance and travel expenses provided for
state officers and employees generally.
Sec. 58. NRS 422.205 is hereby amended to read as follows:
422.205 1. [A reinvestment advisory committee] The
Medicaid Advisory Committee shall:
(a) Solicit and review reports from the Division and Medicaid
managed care organizations concerning the reinvestment of funds
by those Medicaid managed care organizations in the communities
served by the Medicaid managed care organizations.
(b) Report to the Division and Medicaid managed care
organizations concerning initiatives of local governments in [the]
each county whose population is 700,000 or more to address
homelessness, housing issues and social determinants of health.
(c) Make recommendations based on the reports reviewed
pursuant to paragraph (a) to the Division and Medicaid managed
care organizations concerning the reinvestment of funds by those
Medicaid managed care organizations in the communities served by
the Medicaid managed care organizations. Those recommendations
must include, without limitation, recommendations for the use of
such funds for the purposes of:
(1) Developing innovative partnerships with community
development organizations and providers of housing services; and
-
*SB78*

– 57 –
(2) Supporting the initiatives of local governments in [the]
each county whose population is 700,000 or more to address
homelessness, housing issues and social determinants of health.
2. On or before December 31 of each year, [a reinvestment
advisory committee] the Medicaid Advisory Committee shall:
(a) Compile a report concerning:
(1) The uses of funds reinvested by Medicaid managed care
organizations in the communities served by those Medicaid
managed care organizations, including, without limitation, efforts to
address homelessness, disparities in health care and social
determinants of health; and
(2) The activities of the [reinvestment advisory committee]
Medicaid Advisory Committee during the calendar year, including,
without limitation, the recommendations made by the [reinvestment
advisory committee] Medicaid Advisory Committee pursuant to
paragraph (c) of subsection 1.
(b) Submit the report to:
(1) The Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to:
(I) In odd-numbered years, the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Health and Human Services; and
(II) In even-numbered years, the next regular session of
the Legislature.
(2) The Director of the Department.
3. As used in this section, “Medicaid managed care
organization” means a managed care organization that provides
health care services to recipients of Medicaid who reside in [the] a
county [for which a reinvestment advisory committee is
established.] whose population is 700,000 or more.
Sec. 59. NRS 425.610 is hereby amended to read as follows:
425.610 1. The Committee to Review Child Support
Guidelines is hereby created. The Committee consists of:
(a) The presiding judge of the Family Division of the Second
Judicial District Court or his or her designee;
(b) The presiding judge of the Family Division of the Eighth
Judicial District Court or his or her designee;
(c) [One member who is a district court judge or master from a
judicial district other than the Second or Eighth Judicial District,
appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court;
(d) One member who is a justice or retired justice of the
Supreme Court, appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme
Court;
(e)] One member who is a district attorney in Clark County [,]
or Washoe County, appointed by the governing body of the Nevada
District Attorneys Association, or his or her designee;
-
*SB78*

– 58 –
[(f) One member who is a district attorney in Washoe County,
appointed by the governing body of the Nevada District Attorneys
Association, or his or her designee;
(g)] (d) One member who is a district attorney in a county other
than Clark or Washoe County, appointed by the governing body of
the Nevada District Attorneys Association, or his or her designee;
[(h) Two members]
(e) One member who [are members] is a member of the Family
Law Section of the State Bar of Nevada, appointed by the Executive
Council of the Family Law Section;
[(i)] (f) One member who is an employee of the Division,
appointed by the Administrator;
[(j)] (g) One member who has expertise in economics and child
support, appointed by the Administrator;
[(k) Two members]
(h) One member who [are Senators, one of whom] is a Senator,
jointly appointed by the Majority Leader of the Senate and [one of
whom is appointed by] the Minority Leader of the Senate; and
[(l) Two members]
(i) One member who [are members] is a member of the
Assembly [, one of whom is] jointly appointed by the Speaker of the
Assembly and [one of whom is appointed by] the Minority Leader
of the Assembly.
 If any association listed in this subsection ceases to exist, the
appointment required by this subsection must be made by the
association’s successor in interest or, if there is no successor in
interest, by the [Governor.] Director of the Department of Health
and Human Services.
2. Each appointed member serves a term of [4] 2 years.
Members may be reappointed for one additional [terms] term of [4]
2 years in the same manner as the original appointments. Any
vacancy occurring in the membership of the Committee must be
filled in the same manner as the original appointment not later than
30 days after the vacancy occurs.
3. At the first regular meeting every [4] 2 years, the members
of the Committee shall elect a Chair by majority vote who shall
serve until the next Chair is elected.
4. [The Committee shall convene on or before September 1,
2017, and shall meet at least once every 4 years thereafter. The
Committee may also meet at such further times as deemed necessary
by the Chair.
5.] A majority of the members of the Committee constitutes a
quorum for the transaction of business, and a majority of those
members present at any meeting is sufficient for any official action
taken by the Committee.
-
*SB78*

– 59 –
Sec. 60. Chapter 427A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Nevada Commission on Aging and Cognitive Health,
consisting of seven members, is hereby created.
2. The Commission consists of:
(a) The following members appointed by the Director:
(1) Two members who are 55 years of age or older and who
have experience with or an interest in and knowledge of the
problems of and services for the aging.
(2) One member who is a representative of the Nevada
System of Higher Education and who has expertise in cognitive
disorders.
(3) One member who is a representative of caregivers for
person with cognitive disorders.
(4) One member who is a representative of the general
public.
(b) One member who is a member of the Senate and one
member who is a member of the Assembly appointed by the
Legislative Commission with appropriate regard for his or her
experience with and knowledge of matters relating to older
persons.
Sec. 61. NRS 433.428 is hereby amended to read as follows:
433.428 [Five] Three behavioral health regions are hereby
created as follows:
1. The Northern Behavioral Health Region consisting of
Carson City and the counties of Churchill, Douglas, Lyon , [and]
Storey [;] and Washoe;
2. [The Washoe Behavioral Health Region consisting of the
county of Washoe;
3.] The Rural Behavioral Health Region consisting of the
counties of Elko, Eureka, Humboldt, Lander, Pershing and White
Pine; and
[4.] 3. The Southern Behavioral Health Region consisting of
the counties of Clark, Esmeralda, Lincoln , [and] Mineral and [the
portion of the county of] Nye . [that is north of the 38th parallel of
north latitude; and
5. The Clark Behavioral Health Region consisting of the
county of Clark and the portion of the county of Nye that is south of
the 38th parallel of north latitude.]
Sec. 62. NRS 433.429 is hereby amended to read as follows:
433.429 1. A regional behavioral health policy board is
hereby created for each behavioral health region.
2. Each policy board consists of [not less than 7] seven
members [and not more than 13 members] appointed pursuant to
this section.
-
*SB78*

– 60 –
3. The Speaker of the Assembly shall appoint to each policy
board one member who represents the criminal justice system.
4. The Majority Leader of the Senate shall appoint to each
policy board one member who represents law enforcement agencies
and who has experience with and knowledge of matters relating to
persons in need of behavioral health services.
5. The [Governor shall appoint to each policy board one
member who has extensive experience in the delivery of social
services in the field of behavioral health, including, without
limitation, directors or officers of social service agencies in the
behavioral health region.
6. The] Legislative Commission shall appoint to each policy
board one member who is a Legislator.
[7.] 6. The [Administrator] Director of the Department shall
appoint to each policy board:
(a) One member who [represents the interests of hospitals,
residential long-term care facilities or facilities that provide acute
inpatient behavioral health services;
(b) One member who represents the interests of administrators
or counselors who are employed at facilities for the treatment of
alcohol or other substance use disorders; and
(c) One member who represents providers of emergency
medical services or fire services and who has experience providing
emergency services to behavioral health patients, which may
include, without limitation, a paramedic or physician.
8. The members appointed to a policy board pursuant to
subsections 2 to 7, inclusive, may appoint to the policy board:
(a) One member who represents the interests of community-
based organizations which provide] has extensive experience in the
delivery of social services in the field of behavioral health
[services.] , including, without limitation, directors or officers of
social service agencies in the behavioral health region.
(b) One member who represents the interests of owners or
administrators of residential treatment facilities, transitional housing
or other housing for persons with a mental illness or persons who
have an alcohol or other substance use disorder.
[(c) One member who is a health officer of a county or who
holds a position with similar duties or, if no such person is available,
an employee of a city, county or Indian tribe who has experience in
the field of public health.
(d)] (c) One member who is a psychiatrist or a psychologist
who holds the degree of doctor of psychology, has clinical
experience and is licensed to practice in this State or, if no such
person is available, a provider of health care, as defined in NRS
629.031, who has experience working with persons with a mental
-
*SB78*

– 61 –
illness or persons who have an alcohol or other substance use
disorder.
[(e) One member who represents private or public insurers who
offer coverage for behavioral health services or, if no such person is
available, another person who has experience in the field of
insurance or working with insurers.
(f)] (d) One member who has received behavioral health
services in this State, including, without limitation, services for
substance use disorders, or a family member of such a person or, if
such a person is not available, a person who represents the interests
of behavioral health patients or the families of behavioral health
patients.
[9. If the members of a policy board described in subsections 2
to 7, inclusive, appoint both a member described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 8 and a member described in paragraph (b) of subsection
8, at least one of those members must be a behavioral health
professional who has experience in evaluating and treating children.
10.] 7. In making appointments, preference must be given to
persons who reside in the behavioral health region served by the
policy board.
[11.] 8. Each member of the policy board serves [without
compensation] for a term of 2 years and may be reappointed [.] ,
except that a member may not serve more than two terms. The
appointing authority may remove a member from the policy board if
the appointing authority determines the member has neglected his or
her duties.
[12.] 9. If a vacancy occurs during the term of:
(a) A member who was appointed pursuant to subsection [2,] 3,
4 [,] or 5 , [or 6,] the vacancy must be filled in the same manner as
the original appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term.
(b) A member who was appointed pursuant to subsection [7,] 6,
the policy board shall, by majority vote, appoint a member to fill the
vacancy for the remainder of the unexpired term.
[(c) A member who was appointed pursuant to subsection 8, the
policy board may, by majority vote, appoint a member to fill the
vacancy for the remainder of the unexpired term.
13.] 10. Each policy board shall meet not later than 60 days
after all appointments to such board have been made and elect one
member of the policy board to act as the Chair for the biennium.
The Director of the Department or his or her designee shall preside
over the election of the Chair for each policy board at each board’s
first meeting. [Except as otherwise provided in subsection 14, each
policy board shall thereafter meet at least quarterly at the call of the
Chair.]
-
*SB78*

– 62 –
[14.] 11. A policy board is not required to meet during any
legislative session. If a policy board meets during a legislative
session, the member of the policy board who is a Legislator is
excused from attendance.
[15.] 12. As used in this section, “social services agency”
means any public agency or organization that provides social
services in this State, including, without limitation, welfare and
health care services.
Sec. 63. NRS 433.726 is hereby amended to read as follows:
433.726 1. The Advisory Committee for a Resilient Nevada
is hereby created within the Department.
2. The Attorney General shall appoint to the Advisory
Committee [:] five members, including, without limitation:
(a) One member who possesses knowledge, skills and
experience working with youth in the juvenile justice system;
(b) One member who possesses knowledge, skills and
experience working with persons in the criminal justice system;
(c) One member who possesses knowledge, skills and
experience in the surveillance of overdoses; and
(d) [One member] Two members who:
(1) [Resides] Reside in a county other than Clark or Washoe
County; and
(2) [Has] Have experience having a substance use disorder or
having a family member who has a substance use disorder.
3. The Office shall appoint to the Advisory Committee:
(a) One member who:
(1) Resides in Clark County; and
(2) Has experience having a substance use disorder or having
a family member who has a substance use disorder;
(b) One member who possesses knowledge, skills and
experience in public health;
(c) One member who is the director of an agency which
provides child welfare services or his or her designee;
(d) One member who represents a program that specializes in
the prevention of substance use by youth;
(e) One member who represents a faith-based organization that
specializes in recovery from substance use disorders; and
(f) One member who represents a program for substance use
disorders that is operated by a nonprofit organization and certified
pursuant to NRS 458.025.
4. [The Director of the Department shall appoint to the
Advisory Committee:
(a) One member who:
(1) Resides in Washoe County; and
-
*SB78*

– 63 –
(2) Has experience having a substance use disorder or having
a family member who has a substance use disorder;
(b) One member who is a physician certified in the field of
addiction medicine by the American Board of Addiction Medicine
or its successor organization;
(c) One member who represents a nonprofit, community-
oriented organization that specializes in peer-led recovery from
substance use disorders;
(d) One member who has survived an opioid overdose;
(e) One member who represents a program to prevent overdoses
or otherwise reduce the harm caused by the use of substances;
(f) One member who represents an organization that specializes
in housing; and
(g) One member who possesses knowledge, skills and
experience with the education of pupils in kindergarten through 12th
grade.
5.] In appointing the members of the Advisory Committee
pursuant to subsections 2 [,] and 3 , [and 4,] the appointing
authorities shall coordinate the appointments when practicable so
that the members of the Advisory Committee represent the diversity
of:
(a) This State; and
(b) The communities within this State that are disproportionately
affected by opioid use disorder and disparities in access to care and
health outcomes.
[6.] 5. The term of each member of the Advisory Committee is
2 years. A member may be reappointed for an additional term of 2
years in the same manner as the original appointment. A member
may not serve more than two terms. A vacancy occurring in the
membership of the Advisory Committee must be filled in the same
manner as the original appointment.
[7.] 6. To the extent that money is available for these purposes
[:
(a) Each member of the Advisory Committee who is not an
officer or employee of this State is entitled to receive a salary of not
more than $80, as fixed by the Department, for each day or portion
of a day spent on the business of the Advisory Committee.
(b) Each] , each member of the Advisory Committee is entitled
to receive the per diem allowance and travel expenses provided for
state officers and employees generally while engaged in the business
of the Advisory Committee.
[8.] 7. A member of the Advisory Committee who is an officer
or employee of this State or a political subdivision of this State must
be relieved from his or her duties without loss of regular
compensation to prepare for and attend meetings of the Advisory
-
*SB78*

– 64 –
Committee and perform any work necessary to carry out the duties
of the Advisory Committee in the most timely manner practicable.
A state agency or political subdivision of this State shall not require
an officer or employee who is a member of the Advisory Committee
to:
(a) Make up the time he or she is absent from work to carry out
his or her duties as a member of the Advisory Committee; or
(b) Take annual leave or compensatory time for the absence.
Sec. 64. Chapter 433B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Nevada Children’s Mental and Behavioral Health
Consortium consisting of nine members appointed by the Director
of the Department is hereby created within the Department.
2. The Director of the Department shall appoint:
(a) One member who is a representative of the Division of
Public and Behavioral Health of the Department.
(b) One member who is a representative of an agency in a
county in this State which provides child welfare services.
(c) One member who is a representative of the Division of
Health Care Financing and Policy of the Department.
(d) One member who is a representative of the board of
trustees of a school district.
(e) One member who is a representative of a local juvenile
probation department.
(f) One member who is a private provider of mental health
care.
(g) One member who is a provider of foster care.
(h) One member who is the parent of a child with an emotional
disturbance.
(i) One member who is a representative of an agency which
provides services for the treatment and prevention of substance
use disorders.
Sec. 65. Chapter 439 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Wellness and Prevention Advisory Council consisting
of 11 members is hereby created.
2. The Council consists of:
(a) The Chief Medical Officer or his or her designee.
(b) The following members appointed by the Director:
(1) Three members who are physicians who practice in the
area of cardiology, emergency care, neurology, oncology,
orthopedics, pediatrics or primary care and provide care to
patients with rare diseases.
(2) One member who is a registered nurse who provides
care to patients with rare diseases.
-
*SB78*

– 65 –
(3) One member who is the administrator of a hospital that
provides care to patients with rare diseases.
(4) One member who is 18 years of age or older and who
has suffered from or is currently suffering from a rare disease.
(5) One member who is a representative of an organization
dedicated to providing services to patients suffering from rare
diseases in this State.
(6) One member who is a member of a racial or ethnic
minority group appointed from a list of persons submitted to the
Director by the Advisory Committee of the Office of Minority
Health and Equity of the Department.
(7) Two members who are licensed as dietitians pursuant to
chapter 640E of NRS.
Sec. 66. NRS 439.2792 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439.2792 1. There is hereby created within the Department
the Advisory Committee on the State Program for Oral Health to
advise and make recommendations to the Department concerning
the Program.
2. The Director shall appoint to the Advisory Committee [13]
nine members [, including, without limitation, one or more persons
who are representatives of:] as follows:
(a) [Public] Two members who are representatives of public
health care professionals and educators;
(b) [Providers] Three members who are representatives of
providers of oral health care;
(c) [Persons] Two members who are representatives of persons
knowledgeable in promoting and educating the public on oral health
issues; and
(d) [National] Two members who are representatives of dental
[and] or other oral health organizations [and] or their local or state
chapters.
3. After the initial terms, the members of the Advisory
Committee serve terms of 2 years commencing on July 1. A
member may be reappointed [.] , except that a member may not
serve more than two terms.
4. Members of the Advisory Committee serve without
compensation, except that each member is entitled, while engaged in
the business of the Advisory Committee, to the per diem allowance
and travel expenses provided for state officers and employees
generally.
5. Any member of the Advisory Committee who is a public
employee must be granted administrative leave from his or her
duties to engage in the business of the Advisory Committee without
loss of his or her regular compensation. Such leave does not reduce
the amount of the member’s other accrued leave.
-
*SB78*

– 66 –
6. A majority of the members of the Advisory Committee
constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business, and a majority
of a quorum present at any meeting is sufficient for any official
action taken by the Advisory Committee.
7. The Advisory Committee shall:
(a) At its first meeting and annually thereafter, elect a Chair
from among its members; and
(b) [Meet at the call of the Director, the Chair or a majority of its
members as necessary and within the budget of the Advisory
Committee; and
(c)] On or before July 1 of each year, submit a written report to
the Director summarizing the activities of the Advisory Committee
and any recommendations of the Advisory Committee.
Sec. 67. NRS 445B.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
445B.200 1. The State Environmental Commission is hereby
created within the Department. The Commission consists of:
(a) The Director of the Department of Wildlife;
(b) The State Forester Firewarden;
(c) The State Engineer;
(d) The Director of the State Department of Agriculture;
(e) The Administrator of the Division of Minerals of the
Commission on Mineral Resources;
(f) A member of the State Board of Health to be designated by
that Board; and
(g) [Five] Three members appointed by the Governor:
(1) One of whom is a general engineering contractor or a
general building contractor licensed pursuant to chapter 624 of
NRS;
(2) One of whom possesses expertise in performing mining
reclamation; and
(3) One of whom possesses experience and expertise in
advocating issues relating to conservation.
2. The Governor shall appoint the Chair of the Commission
from among the members of the Commission.
3. A majority of the members constitutes a quorum, and a
majority of those present must concur in any decision.
4. Each member who is appointed by the Governor is entitled
to receive a salary of not more than $80, as fixed by the
Commission, for each day’s attendance at a meeting of the
Commission.
5. While engaged in the business of the Commission, each
member and employee of the Commission is entitled to receive the
per diem allowance and travel expenses provided for state officers
and employees generally.
-
*SB78*

– 67 –
6. Any person who receives or has received during the
previous 2 years a significant portion of his or her income, as
defined by any applicable state or federal law, directly or indirectly
from one or more holders of or applicants for a permit required by
NRS 445A.300 to 445A.730, inclusive, is disqualified from serving
as a member of the Commission. The provisions of this subsection
do not apply to any person who receives, or has received during the
previous 2 years, a significant portion of his or her income from any
department or agency of State Government which is a holder of or
an applicant for a permit required by NRS 445A.300 to 445A.730,
inclusive.
7. The Department shall provide technical advice, support and
assistance to the Commission. All state officers, departments,
commissions and agencies, including the Department of
Transportation, the Department of Health and Human Services, the
Nevada System of Higher Education, the State Public Works Board,
the Department of Motor Vehicles, the Department of Public Safety,
the Public Utilities Commission of Nevada, the Nevada
Transportation Authority and the State Department of Agriculture
may also provide technical advice, support and assistance to the
Commission.
Sec. 68. NRS 450B.151 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.151 1. The [Committee on] Emergency Medical
Services [,] Subcommittee of the State Board of Health, consisting
of 11 members appointed by the State Board of Health, is hereby
created.
2. Upon request of the State Board of Health, employee
associations that represent persons that provide emergency medical
services, including, without limitation, physicians and nurses that
provide emergency medical services, emergency medical
technicians, ambulance attendants, firefighters, fire chiefs and
employees of rural hospitals, shall submit to the State Board of
Health written nominations for appointments to the [Committee.]
Subcommittee.
3. After considering the nominations submitted pursuant to
subsection 2, the State Board of Health shall appoint to the
[Committee:] Subcommittee:
(a) One member who is a physician licensed pursuant to chapter
630 or 633 of NRS and who has experience providing emergency
medical services;
(b) One member who is a registered nurse and who has
experience providing emergency medical services;
(c) One member who is a volunteer for an organization that
provides emergency medical services pursuant to this chapter;
-
*SB78*

– 68 –
(d) One member who is employed by a fire-fighting agency at
which some of the firefighters and persons who provide emergency
medical services for the agency are employed and some serve as
volunteers;
(e) One member who is employed by an urban fire-fighting
agency;
(f) One member who is employed by or serves as a volunteer
with a medical facility that is located in a rural area and that
provides emergency medical services;
(g) One member who is employed by an organization that
provides emergency medical services in an air ambulance and
whose duties are closely related to such emergency medical
services;
(h) One member who is employed by or serves as a volunteer
with a local governmental agency that provides emergency medical
services but which is not a part of a fire-fighting agency or law
enforcement agency;
(i) One member who is employed by a privately owned entity
that provides emergency medical services; and
(j) One member who is employed by an operator of a service
which is:
(1) Provided for the benefit of the employees of an industry
who become sick or are injured at the industrial site; and
(2) Staffed by employees who are licensed attendants and
perform emergency medical services primarily for the industry.
4. The [Committee] Subcommittee shall solicit and accept
applications from persons who are employed by or volunteer with
an agency, organization or other operator that provides emergency
medical services on tribal land. After considering the applications
submitted pursuant to this subsection, the [Committee]
Subcommittee shall recommend and the State Board of Health shall
appoint to the [Committee] Subcommittee one member who is
employed by or volunteers with an agency, organization or other
operator that provides emergency medical services on tribal land.
5. In addition to the members set forth in subsections 3 and 4,
the following persons are ex officio members of the [Committee:]
Subcommittee:
(a) An employee of the Division, appointed by the
Administrator of the Division, whose duties relate to administration
and enforcement of the provisions of this chapter;
(b) The county health officer appointed pursuant to NRS
439.290 in each county whose population is 100,000 or more, or the
county health officer’s designee;
-
*SB78*

– 69 –
(c) A physician who is a member of a committee which consists
of directors of trauma centers in this State and who is nominated by
that committee; and
(d) A representative of a committee or group which focuses on
the provision of emergency medical services to children in this State
and who is nominated by that committee or group.
6. The term of each member appointed by the State Board of
Health is 2 years. A member may not serve more than two
consecutive terms but may serve more than two terms if there is a
break in service of not less than 2 years.
7. The State Board of Health shall not appoint to the
[Committee] Subcommittee two persons who are employed by or
volunteer with the same organization, except the State Board of
Health may appoint a person who is employed by or volunteers with
the same organization of which a member who serves ex officio is
an employee.
8. Each member of the [Committee] Subcommittee shall
appoint an alternate to serve in the member’s place if the member is
temporarily unable to perform the duties required of him or her
pursuant to NRS 450B.151 to 450B.154, inclusive.
9. A position on the [Committee] Subcommittee that becomes
vacant before the end of the term of the member must be filled in
the same manner as the original appointment.
Sec. 69. NRS 490.067 is hereby amended to read as follows:
490.067 1. The Commission on Off-Highway Vehicles is
hereby created in the State Department of Conservation and Natural
Resources.
2. The Commission consists of:
(a) [One member who is an authorized dealer, appointed by the
Governor;
(b)] One member who is a sportsman, appointed by the
[Governor] Director of the State Department of Conservation and
Natural Resources from a list of persons submitted by the Director
of the Department of Wildlife;
[(c) One member who is a rancher, appointed by the Governor
from a list of persons submitted by the Director of the State
Department of Agriculture;
(d)] (b) One member who is a representative of the Nevada
Association of Counties, appointed by the [Governor] Director of
the State Department of Conservation and Natural Resources from
a list of persons submitted by the Executive Director of the
Association;
[(e)] (c) One member who is a representative of law
enforcement, appointed by the [Governor] Director of the State
-
*SB78*

– 70 –
Department of Conservation and Natural Resources from a list of
persons submitted by the Nevada Sheriffs’ and Chiefs’ Association;
[(f)] (d) One member who is actively engaged in and possesses
experience and expertise in advocating for issues relating to
conservation, appointed by the [Governor; and] Director of the
State Department of Conservation and Natural Resources;
[(g) Three members,]
(e) One member, appointed by the [Governor,] Director of the
State Department of Conservation and Natural Resources, who
[reside] resides in the State of Nevada and [have participated] has
experience in recreational activities for at least one of the following
types of off-highway vehicles : [for at least 5 years using the type of
off-highway vehicle owned or operated by the persons they will
represent, as follows:]
(1) [One member who represents persons who own or
operate all-terrain] All-terrain vehicles . [;]
(2) [One member who represents persons who own or
operate all-terrain motorcycles and who is involved with or
participates in the racing of off-highway motorcycles; and]
Motorcycles.
(3) [One member who represents persons who own or
operate snowmobiles.] Snowmobiles.
[3. The following are nonvoting, ex officio members of the
Commission:
(a)] (f) The State Director of the Nevada State Office of the
Bureau of Land Management; and
[(b) The Forest Supervisor for the Humboldt-Toiyabe National
Forest;
(c)] (g) The Director of the Department of Tourism and Cultural
Affairs . [; and
(d) The Director of the Department of Motor Vehicles.
4.] 3. A [nonvoting, ex officio] member of the Commission
specified in paragraph (f) or (g) of subsection 2 may appoint, in
writing, an alternate to serve in his or her place on the Commission.
[5.] 4. The [Governor] Director of the State Department of
Conservation and Natural Resources shall not appoint to the
Commission [any] the member described in paragraph [(g)] (e) of
subsection 2 unless the member has been recommended to the
[Governor] Director by an off-highway vehicle organization. As
used in this subsection, “off-highway vehicle organization” means a
profit or nonprofit corporation, association or organization formed
pursuant to the laws of this State and which promotes off-highway
vehicle recreation or racing.
[6.] 5. After the initial terms, each member of the Commission
appointed pursuant to subsection 2 serves for a term of [3] 2 years.
-
*SB78*

– 71 –
A vacancy on the Commission must be filled in the same manner as
the original appointment.
[7. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a]
6. A member of the Commission who is appointed may not
serve more than two [consecutive] terms on the Commission. [A
member who has served two consecutive terms on the Commission
may be reappointed if the Governor does not receive any
applications for that member’s seat or if the Governor determines
that no qualified applicants are available to fill that member’s seat.
8.] 7. The [Governor] Director of the State Department of
Conservation and Natural Resources shall ensure that, insofar as
practicable, the members appointed to the Commission pursuant to
subsection 2 reflect the geographical diversity of this State.
[9.] 8. Each member of the Commission:
(a) Is entitled to receive, if money is available for that purpose,
the per diem allowance and travel expenses provided for state
officers and employees generally.
(b) [Who is not an officer or employee of the State of Nevada is
entitled to receive, if money is available for that purpose, a salary of
not more than $80 per day for each day of attendance at a meeting
of the Commission.
(c)] Shall swear or affirm that he or she will work to create and
promote responsible off-highway vehicle recreation in the State.
[10.] 9. A member of the Commission who is appointed by the
[Governor] Director of the State Department of Conservation and
Natural Resources and who fails to attend at least three consecutive
meetings of the Commission is subject to replacement. The
Commission shall notify the appointing authority or group who
recommended the member for appointment, if any, and the
appointing authority or group may recommend a person to replace
that member of the Commission. The replacement of a member
pursuant to this subsection must be conducted in the same manner as
the original appointment.
Sec. 70. NRS 561.045 is hereby amended to read as follows:
561.045 There is hereby created in the Department a State
Board of Agriculture composed of [13] nine members appointed by
the Governor.
Sec. 71. NRS 561.055 is hereby amended to read as follows:
561.055 1. The membership of the Board consists of:
(a) [Two members] One member who [are] is actively engaged
in range or semirange cattle or sheep production.
(b) One member who is actively engaged in dairy production.
(c) [One member who is actively engaged in range or semirange
sheep production.
(d)] One member who is actively engaged in general agriculture.
-
*SB78*

– 72 –
[(e) Two members]
(d) One member who [are] is actively engaged in growing
crops, at least one of which is a specialty crop.
[(f)] (e) One member who is actively engaged in the control of
pests.
[(g)] (f) One member who is actively engaged in the petroleum
industry [.
(h)] or who is working in the field of supplemental nutrition
distribution or a similar field.
(g) One member who is actively engaged in raising nursery
stock.
[(i) One member who is working in the field of supplemental
nutrition distribution.
(j)] (h) One member who is actively engaged in food
manufacturing or animal processing.
[(k)] (i) One member who has veterinary experience in a mixed-
animal or large-animal practice and is licensed to practice veterinary
medicine pursuant to chapter 638 of NRS.
2. Not more than two members may be residents of the same
county.
Sec. 72. NRS 610.030 is hereby amended to read as follows:
610.030 There is hereby created the State Apprenticeship
Council composed of:
1. The following [voting] members, appointed by the Governor
upon recommendation of the Labor Commissioner:
(a) [Two members] One member who [represent] represents
management and [have,] has, or [have] has had, a defined role in a
jointly administered apprenticeship program . [, one of whom must
be from northern Nevada and one of whom must be from southern
Nevada.]
(b) [Two members] One member who [represent] represents
labor and [have,] has, or [have] has had, a defined role in a jointly
administered apprenticeship program . [, one of whom must be from
northern Nevada and one of whom must be from southern Nevada.]
(c) [Two members, one] One member who represents
management and one member who represents labor, who have, or
have had, a defined role or job in a statewide, jointly administered
apprenticeship program.
(d) One member who is a representative of the general public.
2. [The following nonvoting members:
(a)] The Executive Director of the Office of Economic
Development or his or her designee.
[(b)] 3. The Superintendent of Public Instruction or his or her
designee.
-
*SB78*

– 73 –
[(c)] 4. One representative of a community college [located in
a county whose population is 700,000 or more,] appointed by the
Chancellor of the Nevada System of Higher Education.
[(d) One representative of a community college located in a
county whose population is less than 700,000, appointed by the
Chancellor of the Nevada System of Higher Education.]
Sec. 73. NRS 612.220 is hereby amended to read as follows:
612.220 The Administrator:
1. Shall administer this chapter.
2. [Is responsible for the administration, through the
Administrator of the Commission on Postsecondary Education, of
the provisions of NRS 394.383 to 394.560, inclusive.
3.] Has power and authority to adopt, amend or rescind such
rules and regulations consistent with the provisions of federal law,
to employ, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, such
persons, make such expenditures, require such reports, make such
investigations, and take such other action as the Administrator
deems necessary or suitable to that end.
[4.] 3. Shall determine his or her own organization and
methods of procedure for the Division in accordance with the
provisions of this chapter.
[5.] 4. To the extent allowed by federal law, may, by
regulation, suspend, modify, amend or waive any requirement of
this chapter for the duration of a state of emergency or declaration
of disaster proclaimed pursuant to NRS 414.070 and for any
additional period of time during which the emergency or disaster
directly affects the requirement of this chapter if:
(a) The Administrator determines the action is:
(1) In the best interest of the Division, this State or the
general health, safety and welfare of the citizens of this State; or
(2) Necessary to comply with instructions received from the
Department of Labor; and
(b) The action of the Administrator is approved by the
Governor.
Sec. 74. NRS 616B.554 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.554 1. There is hereby created in the Fund for
Workers’ Compensation and Safety in the State Treasury the
Subsequent Injury Account for Self-Insured Employers, which may
be used only to make payments in accordance with the provisions of
NRS 616B.557 and 616B.560. The [Board] Administrator shall
administer the Account . [based upon recommendations made by the
Administrator pursuant to subsection 8.]
2. All assessments, penalties, bonds, securities and all other
properties received, collected or acquired by the [Board for the
Subsequent Injury Account for Self-Insured Employers]
-
*SB78*

– 74 –
Administrator pursuant to this section, NRS 616B.557 and
616B.560 must be delivered to the custody of the State Treasurer.
3. All money and securities in the Account must be held by the
State Treasurer as custodian thereof to be used solely for workers’
compensation for employees of self-insured employers.
4. The State Treasurer may disburse money from the Account
only upon written order of the [Board.] Administrator.
5. The State Treasurer shall invest money of the Account in the
same manner and in the same securities in which the State Treasurer
is authorized to invest State General Funds which are in the custody
of the State Treasurer. Income realized from the investment of the
assets of the Account must be credited to the Fund.
6. The [Board] Administrator shall adopt regulations for the
establishment and administration of assessment rates, payments and
penalties. Assessment rates must result in an equitable distribution
of costs among the self-insured employers and must be based upon
expected annual expenditures for claims for payments from the
Subsequent Injury Account for Self-Insured Employers.
7. The Commissioner shall assign an actuary to review the
establishment of assessment rates. The rates must be filed with the
Commissioner 30 days before their effective date. Any self-insured
employer who wishes to appeal the rate so filed must do so pursuant
to NRS 679B.310.
8. The Administrator shall [:
(a) Evaluate] evaluate any claim submitted to the [Board]
Administrator for payment or reimbursement from the Subsequent
Injury Account for Self-Insured Employers and [recommend to the
Board any] determine the appropriate action to be taken concerning
the claim . [; and
(b) Submit to the Board any other recommendations relating to
the Account.]
Sec. 75. NRS 616B.557 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.557 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 616B.560:
1. If an employee of a self-insured employer has a permanent
physical impairment from any cause or origin and incurs a
subsequent disability by injury arising out of and in the course of his
or her employment which entitles the employee to compensation for
disability that is substantially greater by reason of the combined
effects of the preexisting impairment and the subsequent injury than
that which would have resulted from the subsequent injury alone,
the compensation due must be charged to the Subsequent Injury
Account for Self-Insured Employers in accordance with regulations
adopted by the [Board.] Administrator.
2. If the subsequent injury of such an employee results in his or
her death and it is determined that the death would not have
-
*SB78*

– 75 –
occurred except for the preexisting permanent physical impairment,
the compensation due must be charged to the Subsequent Injury
Account for Self-Insured Employers in accordance with regulations
adopted by the [Board.] Administrator.
3. As used in this section, “permanent physical impairment”
means any permanent condition, whether congenital or caused by
injury or disease, of such seriousness as to constitute a hindrance or
obstacle to obtaining employment or to obtaining reemployment if
the employee is unemployed. For the purposes of this section, a
condition is not a “permanent physical impairment” unless it would
support a rating of permanent impairment of 6 percent or more of
the whole person if evaluated according to the American Medical
Association’s Guides to the Evaluation of Permanent Impairment as
adopted and supplemented by the Division pursuant to
NRS 616C.110.
4. To qualify under this section for reimbursement from the
Subsequent Injury Account for Self-Insured Employers, the self-
insured employer must establish by written records that the self-
insured employer had knowledge of the “permanent physical
impairment” at the time the employee was hired or that the
employee was retained in employment after the self-insured
employer acquired such knowledge.
5. A self-insured employer must submit to the [Board]
Administrator a claim for reimbursement from the Subsequent
Injury Account for Self-Insured Employers.
6. The [Board] Administrator shall adopt regulations
establishing procedures for submitting claims against the
Subsequent Injury Account for Self-Insured Employers. The
[Board] Administrator shall notify the self-insured employer of its
decision on such a claim within 120 days after the claim is received.
7. An appeal of any decision made concerning a claim against
the Subsequent Injury Account for Self-Insured Employers must be
submitted directly to the [district court.] appeals officer.
Sec. 76. NRS 616B.572 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.572 [1. The members of the Board may meet
throughout each year at the times and places specified by a call of
the Chair or a majority of the Board. The Board may prescribe rules
and regulations for its own management and government. Three
members of the Board constitute a quorum, and a quorum may
exercise all the power and authority conferred on the Board. If a
member of the Board submits a claim against the Subsequent Injury
Account for Associations of Self-Insured Public or Private
Employers, that member shall not vote on or otherwise participate in
the decision of the Board concerning that claim.
-
*SB78*

– 76 –
2.] The [Board] Administrator shall administer the Subsequent
Injury Account for Associations of Self-Insured Public or Private
Employers in accordance with the provisions of NRS 616B.575,
616B.578 and 616B.581.
Sec. 77. NRS 616B.575 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.575 1. There is hereby created in the Fund for
Workers’ Compensation and Safety in the State Treasury the
Subsequent Injury Account for Associations of Self-Insured Public
or Private Employers, which may be used only to make payments in
accordance with the provisions of NRS 616B.578 and 616B.581.
The [Board] Administrator shall administer the Account . [based
upon recommendations made by the Administrator pursuant to
subsection 8.]
2. All assessments, penalties, bonds, securities and all other
properties received, collected or acquired by the [Board for the
Subsequent Injury Account for Associations of Self-Insured Public
or Private Employers] Administrator pursuant to this section, NRS
616B.578 and 616B.581 must be delivered to the custody of the
State Treasurer.
3. All money and securities in the Account must be held by the
State Treasurer as custodian thereof to be used solely for workers’
compensation for employees of members of Associations of Self-
Insured Public or Private Employers.
4. The State Treasurer may disburse money from the Account
only upon written order of the [Board.] Administrator.
5. The State Treasurer shall invest money of the Account in the
same manner and in the same securities in which the State Treasurer
is authorized to invest State General Funds which are in the custody
of the State Treasurer. Income realized from the investment of the
assets of the Account must be credited to the Account.
6. The [Board] Administrator shall adopt regulations for the
establishment and administration of assessment rates, payments and
penalties. Assessment rates must result in an equitable distribution
of costs among the associations of self-insured public or private
employers and must be based upon expected annual expenditures for
claims for payments from the Subsequent Injury Account for
Associations of Self-Insured Public or Private Employers.
7. The Commissioner shall assign an actuary to review the
establishment of assessment rates. The rates must be filed with the
Commissioner 30 days before their effective date. Any association
of self-insured public or private employers that wishes to appeal the
rate so filed must do so pursuant to NRS 679B.310.
8. The Administrator shall [:
(a) Evaluate] evaluate any claim submitted to the [Board]
Administrator for payment or reimbursement from the Subsequent
-
*SB78*

– 77 –
Injury Account for Associations of Self-Insured Public or Private
Employers and [recommend to the Board any] determine the
appropriate action to be taken concerning the claim . [; and
(b) Submit to the Board any other recommendations relating to
the Account.]
Sec. 78. NRS 618.605 is hereby amended to read as follows:
618.605 1. Upon the receipt of any written appeal or notice
of contest under NRS 618.475, the Division shall within 15 working
days [notify the Board of such an] assign a hearing officer to hear
the appeal or contest.
2. The [Board] hearing officer assigned pursuant to
subsection 1 shall hold a formal fact-finding hearing and render its
decision based on the evidence presented at the hearing.
3. Prior to any formal fact-finding hearing involving a citation
for an accident or motor vehicle crash occurring in the course of
employment which is fatal to one or more employees, the [Board]
Division shall notify the immediate family of each deceased
employee of:
(a) The time and place of the hearing; and
(b) The fact that the hearing is open to the public.
4. Any employee of an employer or representative of the
employee may participate in and give evidence at the hearing,
subject to rules and regulations of the [Board] Division governing
the conduct of such hearings.
Sec. 79. NRS 622A.300 is hereby amended to read as follows:
622A.300 1. To initiate the prosecution of a contested case,
the prosecutor shall file a charging document with the regulatory
body and serve the licensee with the charging document.
2. [The] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a
regulatory body shall determine whether the case will be heard by
the regulatory body or a hearing panel or officer. If the regulatory
body is a professional or occupational licensing board under the
purview of the Office of Nevada Boards, Commissions and
Councils Standards of the Department of Business and Industry
pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 232.8415, the case must be heard
by a hearing officer employed by the Office.
3. The regulatory body or hearing panel or officer shall provide
the licensee with written notice of the case pursuant to NRS
233B.121 and 241.0333.
4. If the case is heard by a hearing panel or officer, the hearing
panel or officer shall follow the procedures established by this
chapter and any other applicable statutory and regulatory provisions
governing the case. The hearing panel or officer shall prepare
written findings and recommendations and serve the findings and
-
*SB78*

– 78 –
recommendations on the parties and the regulatory body for its
review.
5. The findings and recommendations of the hearing panel or
officer do not become final unless they are approved by the
regulatory body after review. In reviewing the findings and
recommendations of the hearing panel or officer, the regulatory
body may:
(a) Approve the findings and recommendations, with or without
modification;
(b) Reject the findings and recommendations and remand the
case to the hearing panel or officer;
(c) Reject the findings and recommendations and order a hearing
de novo before the regulatory body; or
(d) Take any other action that the regulatory body deems
appropriate to resolve the case.
6. If the case is heard by the regulatory body, the regulatory
body shall follow the procedures established by this chapter and any
other applicable statutory and regulatory provisions governing the
case.
7. The regulatory body or the hearing panel or officer, with the
approval of the regulatory body, may consolidate two or more cases
if it appears that the cases involve common issues of law or fact and
the interests of the parties will not be prejudiced by the
consolidation.
Sec. 80. Chapter 623 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Nevada Board of Professional Design and
Environmental Specialist is hereby created.
2. The Board consists of:
(a) The Chief Medical Officer or his or her designee.
(b) Twelve members appointed by the Governor as follows:
(1) One member who is registered as a registered
residential designer pursuant to this chapter.
(2) One member who is registered as a registered interior
designer pursuant to this chapter.
(3) One member who is registered as an architect pursuant
to this chapter and who has been in the active practice of
architecture in this State for not less than 3 years immediately
preceding his or her appointment.
(4) Two members who:
(I) Are registered as landscape architects pursuant to
chapter 623A of NRS;
(II) Have been engaged in the practice of landscape
architecture in this State for not less than 3 years immediately
preceding their appointments; and
-
*SB78*

– 79 –
(III) Have not been the subject of any disciplinary
action by the Board in the 3 years immediately preceding their
appointment.
(5) Two members engaged in the practice or teaching of
professional engineering who are licensed pursuant to chapter 625
of NRS.
(6) Two members engaged in the practice or teaching of
professional land surveying who are licensed pursuant to chapter
625 of NRS.
(7) One member who is employed by the health district
containing Clark County and one member who is employed by the
health district containing Washoe County, each of whom:
(I) Holds a current registration issued pursuant to NRS
625A.110 that is in good standing; and
(II) Has practiced in the field of environmental health
for the 3 years immediately preceding his or her appointment.
(8) One member who represents the interests of the general
public and who:
(I) Does not hold a license or registration issued by the
Board;
(II) Is not the spouse or the parent or child, by blood,
marriage or adoption, of a person who holds a license or
registration issued by the Board; and
(III) Does not have a pecuniary interest in any matter
pertaining to the professions and occupations regulated by the
Board, except as a client or potential client.
3. Each member of the Board must be a resident of this State.
Sec. 81. NRS 624.070 is hereby amended to read as follows:
624.070 1. Each member of the Board serves a term of 4
years. A member of the Board may not serve more than two terms.
2. Each member of the Board shall:
[1.] (a) Receive a certificate of appointment from the Governor.
[2.] (b) Before entering upon the discharge of the duties of his
or her office, take the constitutional oath of office.
Sec. 82. NRS 624.570 is hereby amended to read as follows:
624.570 1. The Commission on Construction Education is
hereby created.
2. The Commission consists of one member who is a member
of the Board and [six] four members appointed by the Governor as
follows:
(a) [Four] Two members who are representatives of the
construction industry [;] and who are not residents of the same
county; and
(b) Two members who have knowledge of construction
education programs.
-
*SB78*

– 80 –
3. Each member of the Commission serves a term of [3] 4
years. A member may not serve more than two terms.
4. [The members] Each member of the Commission [who are
appointed by the Governor serve without compensation,] is entitled
to:
(a) A salary of not more than $150 per day, as fixed by the
Deputy Director of the Office of Nevada Boards, Commissions and
Councils Standards of the Department of Business and Industry
and approved by the Director of the Department, while engaged in
the business of the Commission; and
(b) A per diem allowance [or reimbursement for] and travel
expenses [. While engaged in the business of the Commission, the
member who is a member of the Board shall receive from the Board
the same salary, per diem allowance and reimbursement for travel
expenses the member receives] at a rate fixed by the Deputy
Director of the Office of Nevada Boards, Commissions and
Councils Standards of the Department of Business and Industry
and approved by the Director of the Department while engaged in
the business of the [Board.] Commission. The rate must not exceed
the rate provided for state officers and employees generally.
5. The Commission shall review programs of education which
relate to building construction and distribute grants from the
Construction Education Account created pursuant to NRS 624.580
for programs that the Commission determines qualify for such a
grant.
6. The Board may adopt regulations which establish the rules
of procedure for meetings of the Commission.
7. The Commission shall adopt regulations providing:
(a) Procedures for applying for a grant of money from the
Construction Education Account;
(b) Procedures for reviewing an application for a grant from the
Construction Education Account; and
(c) Qualifications for receiving a grant from the Construction
Education Account.
Sec. 83. NRS 628.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
628.090 1. Annually the Board shall elect a President and a
Secretary-Treasurer from among its members.
2. The Board may employ such personnel, including
[attorneys,] investigators and other professional consultants, and
arrange for such assistance as the Board may require for the
performance of its duties.
Sec. 84. NRS 628.130 is hereby amended to read as follows:
628.130 The Board shall:
1. Have a seal of which judicial notice must be taken.
-
*SB78*

– 81 –
2. Keep records of its proceedings. In any proceedings in court,
civil or criminal, arising out of or founded upon any provision of
this chapter, copies of those records certified as correct under the
seal of the Board are admissible in evidence as tending to prove the
contents of the records.
3. [Maintain a website on the Internet or its successor and post]
Post on [its] the Internet website [:] maintained by the Office of
Nevada Boards, Commissions and Councils Standards of the
Department of Business and Industry pursuant to section 15 of
this act:
(a) The names arranged alphabetically by classifications of all
accountants and business entities holding certificates, registrations
or permits under this chapter.
(b) The names of the members of the Board.
(c) Such other matter as may be deemed proper by the Board.
Sec. 85. NRS 629.031 is hereby amended to read as follows:
629.031 Except as otherwise provided by a specific statute:
1. “Provider of health care” means:
(a) A physician licensed pursuant to chapter 630 [, 630A] or 633
of NRS;
(b) A physician assistant;
(c) An anesthesiologist assistant;
(d) A dentist;
(e) A dental therapist;
(f) A dental hygienist;
(g) A licensed nurse;
(h) A person who holds a license as an attendant or who is
certified as an emergency medical technician, advanced emergency
medical technician or paramedic pursuant to chapter 450B of NRS
or authorized to practice as an emergency medical technician,
advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic in this State
under the Recognition of Emergency Medical Services Personnel
Licensure Interstate Compact ratified by NRS 450B.145;
(i) A dispensing optician;
(j) An optometrist;
(k) A speech-language pathologist;
(l) An audiologist;
(m) A practitioner of respiratory care;
(n) A licensed physical therapist;
(o) An occupational therapist;
(p) A podiatric physician;
(q) A licensed psychologist;
(r) A licensed marriage and family therapist;
(s) A licensed clinical professional counselor;
(t) [A music therapist;
-
*SB78*

– 82 –
(u)] A chiropractic physician;
[(v)] (u) An athletic trainer;
[(w)] (v) A perfusionist;
[(x)] (w) A doctor of Oriental medicine in any form;
[(y)] (x) A medical laboratory director or technician;
[(z)] (y) A pharmacist;
[(aa)] (z) A licensed dietitian;
[(bb)] (aa) An associate in social work, a social worker, a
master social worker, an independent social worker or a clinical
social worker licensed pursuant to chapter 641B of NRS;
[(cc)] (bb) An alcohol and drug counselor or a problem
gambling counselor who is certified pursuant to chapter 641C of
NRS;
[(dd)] (cc) An alcohol and drug counselor or a clinical alcohol
and drug counselor who is licensed pursuant to chapter 641C of
NRS;
[(ee)] (dd) A behavior analyst, assistant behavior analyst or
registered behavior technician;
[(ff)] (ee) A naprapath; or
[(gg)] (ff) A medical facility as the employer of any person
specified in this subsection.
2. For the purposes of NRS 629.400 to 629.490, inclusive, the
term includes a person who holds a current license or certificate to
practice his or her respective discipline pursuant to the applicable
provisions of law of another state or territory of the United States.
Sec. 86. Chapter 630 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Nevada Medical Board, consisting of 11 members
appointed by the Governor, is hereby created.
2. The Governor shall appoint:
(a) Four members who are licensed as physicians pursuant to
this chapter.
(b) Four members who are licensed as osteopathic physicians
pursuant to chapter 633 of NRS.
(c) One member who is licensed as a physician assistant
pursuant to this chapter or chapter 633 of NRS.
(d) One member who is licensed as a practitioner of
respiratory care pursuant to this chapter.
(e) One member who represents the interests of the general
public and who:
(1) Does not hold a license issued by the Board;
(2) Is not the spouse or the parent or child, by blood,
marriage or adoption, of a person who holds a license issued by
the Board; and
-
*SB78*

– 83 –
(3) Does not have a pecuniary interest in any matter
pertaining to the professions and occupations regulated by the
Board, except as a patient or potential patient.
Sec. 87. Chapter 631 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
The Board may, by regulation, defer the expiration of a license
issued pursuant this chapter of a person who is on active duty in
any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States upon such
terms and conditions as it may prescribe. The Board may similarly
defer the expiration of a license of the spouse or dependent child
of that person if the spouse or child is residing with the person.
Sec. 88. NRS 632.060 is hereby amended to read as follows:
632.060 1. Each year at a meeting of the Board, to be held in
accordance with NRS 632.070, the Board shall elect from its
members a President, a Vice President and a Secretary.
2. The [Board] Director of the Department of Business and
Industry may appoint an Executive Director of the Board who need
not be a member of the Board. [The Executive Director appointed
by the Board must be a professional nurse licensed to practice
nursing in the State of Nevada.] The Executive Director [shall] :
(a) Is in the unclassified service of the State and serves at the
pleasure of the Director.
(b) Shall perform such duties as [the Board may direct and] are
directed by the Deputy Director of the Office of Nevada Boards,
Commissions and Councils Standards of the Department of
Business and Industry, as advised by the Board.
3. The Executive Director is entitled to receive compensation
as set by the [Board.] Deputy Director of the Office of Nevada
Boards, Commissions and Councils Standards. The Executive
Director is entitled to receive a per diem allowance and travel
expenses at a rate fixed by the [Board,] Deputy Director while
engaged in the business of the Board. The rate must not exceed the
rate provided for state officers and employees generally.
Sec. 89. Chapter 634 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Nevada Board of Healing and Rehabilitative Practice,
consisting of 13 members appointed by the Governor, is hereby
created.
2. The Governor shall appoint to the Board:
(a) One member who is licensed as an athletic trainer
pursuant to chapter 640B of NRS and who has engaged in the
practice of athletic training or taught or conducted research
concerning the practice of athletic training for the 5 years
immediately preceding his or her appointment.
-
*SB78*

– 84 –
(b) Three members who are licensed as physical therapists
pursuant to chapter 640 of NRS.
(c) Three members who are licensed as massage therapists
pursuant to chapter 640C of NRS, one of whom must be a resident
of Clark County, one of whom must be a resident of Washoe
County and one of whom must be a resident of a county other
than Clark County or Washoe County.
(d) Two members who are licensed as occupational therapists
pursuant to chapter 640A of NRS.
(e) Two members who are licensed as chiropractic physicians
pursuant to this chapter.
(f) One member who is licensed pursuant to chapter 634A of
NRS and engaged in the practice of Oriental medicine in this
State.
(g) One member who represents the interests of the general
public and who:
(1) Does not hold a license issued by the Board;
(2) Is not the spouse or the parent or child, by blood,
marriage or adoption, of a person who holds a license issued by
the Board; or
(3) Does not have a pecuniary interest in any matter
pertaining to the professions and occupations regulated by the
Board, except as a patient or potential patient.
Sec. 90. NRS 634B.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
634B.100 1. The Naprapathic Practice Advisory [Board]
Subcommittee of the Board is hereby created.
2. The [Governor] Board shall appoint to the Advisory
[Board:] Subcommittee:
(a) Three members who are licensed as naprapaths in this State
or any other state; and
(b) Two members who are representatives of the public.
3. Each member of the Advisory [Board:] Subcommittee:
(a) Must be a resident of this State; and
(b) May not serve more than two consecutive terms.
4. After the initial terms, the members of the Advisory [Board]
Subcommittee must be appointed to terms of 4 years. A member:
(a) Serves until a replacement is appointed; and
(b) May not serve more than two full terms.
5. A vacancy on the Advisory [Board] Subcommittee must be
filled in the same manner as the original appointment for the
remainder of the unexpired term.
6. The [Governor] Board may remove a member of the
Advisory [Board] Subcommittee for incompetence, neglect of duty,
moral turpitude or malfeasance in office.
-
*SB78*

– 85 –
7. The members of the Advisory [Board] Subcommittee are not
entitled to receive a salary. While engaged in the business of the
Advisory [Board,] Subcommittee, each member of the Advisory
[Board] Subcommittee is entitled to receive a per diem allowance
and travel expenses at a rate fixed by the [State] Board . [of Health.]
The rate must not exceed the rate provided for officers and
employees of this State generally.
Sec. 91. Chapter 635 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Nevada Board of Vision, Speech and Mobility
Professions, consisting of 11 members appointed by the Governor,
is hereby created.
2. The Governor shall appoint to the Board:
(a) Two members who are licensed as speech-language
pathologists pursuant to chapter 637B of NRS;
(b) Two members who are licensed as podiatric physicians
pursuant to this chapter.
(c) One member who is licensed as an audiologist pursuant to
chapter 637B of NRS.
(d) Two members who are licensed to practice optometry
pursuant to chapter 636 of NRS.
(e) Two members who are licensed as dispensing opticians
pursuant to chapter 637 of NRS.
(f) One member who is licensed as a hearing aid specialist
pursuant to chapter 637B of NRS.
(g) One member who represents the interests of the general
public and who:
(1) Does not hold a license issued by the Board;
(2) Is not the spouse or the parent or child, by blood,
marriage or adoption, a person who holds a license issued by the
Board; and
(3) Does not have a pecuniary interest in any matter
pertaining to the professions and occupations regulated by the
Board, except as a patient or potential patient.
Sec. 92. NRS 639.050 is hereby amended to read as follows:
639.050 1. The Board shall hold a meeting at least once in
every 6 months.
2. Four members of the Board constitute a quorum.
3. Meetings of the Board which are held to prepare, grade or
administer examinations are closed to the public.
4. Each member of the Board is entitled to receive:
(a) A salary of not more than $150 per day, as fixed by the
[Board,] Deputy Director of the Office of Nevada Boards,
Commissions and Councils Standards of the Department of
-
*SB78*

– 86 –
Business and Industry and approved by the Director of the
Department while engaged in the business of the Board; and
(b) A per diem allowance and travel expenses at a rate fixed by
the [Board,] Deputy Director of the Office of Nevada Boards,
Commissions and Councils Standards of the Department of
Business and Industry and approved by the Director of the
Department while engaged in the business of the Board. The rate
must not exceed the rate provided for state officers and employees
generally.
5. While engaged in the business of the Board, each employee
of the Board is entitled to receive a per diem allowance and travel
expenses at a rate fixed by the Board. The rate must not exceed the
rate provided for state officers and employees generally.
Sec. 93. Chapter 641 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Nevada Behavioral Wellness Alliance Board,
consisting of 13 members appointed by the Governor, is hereby
created.
2. The Governor shall appoint to the Board:
(a) One member who is licensed as a behavioral analyst or
assistant behavior analyst pursuant to chapter 641D of NRS.
(b) Two members who are licensed as marriage and family
therapists pursuant to chapter 641A of NRS.
(c) One member who is licensed as a clinical professional
counselor pursuant to chapter 641A of NRS.
(d) Two members who are licensed as social workers pursuant
to chapter 641B of NRS.
(e) One member who is licensed as a psychologist pursuant to
this chapter.
(f) One member who is licensed as a clinical alcohol and drug
counselor or alcohol and drug counselor pursuant to chapter
641C of NRS.
(g) One member who is certified as a problem gambling
counselor pursuant to chapter 641C of NRS.
(h) One member who holds any license or certificate issued by
the Board.
(i) One member who represents an academic or training
institution that provides training necessary for a person to become
licensed by the Board.
(j) One member who represents persons who are indigent,
uninsured or unable to afford health care.
(k) One member who represents the interests of the general
public and who:
(1) Does not hold a license issued by the Board;
-
*SB78*

– 87 –
(2) Is not the spouse or the parent or child, by blood,
marriage or adoption, of a person who holds a license issued by
the Board; and
(3) Does not have a pecuniary interest in any matter
pertaining to the professions and occupations regulated by the
Board, except as a patient of potential patient.
Sec. 94. NRS 643.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
643.020 1. The State Barbers’ Health and Sanitation Board,
consisting of four members, is hereby created.
2. The Board consists of the Chief Medical Officer, or a
member of his or her staff designated by the Chief Medical Officer,
and three members who are licensed barbers appointed by the
Governor for terms of 4 years. Of the barbers, one barber must be
from Clark County, one barber must be from Washoe County and
one barber must be from any county in the State. Each of the barbers
must have been a resident of this State and a practicing licensed
barber for at least 5 years immediately before his or her
appointment. An appointed member of the Board shall not serve
more than [three] two terms.
3. The Governor may remove a member of the Board for cause.
Sec. 95. NRS 652.170 is hereby amended to read as follows:
652.170 1. The Board shall appoint the members of the
Medical Laboratory Advisory [Committee.] Subcommittee of the
Board.
2. After the initial terms, members shall serve for 3-year terms.
3. A member may not serve for more than two consecutive
terms. Service of 2 or more years in filling an unexpired term
constitutes a term.
4. The [Advisory Committee] Subcommittee is composed of:
(a) Two pathologists, certified in clinical pathology by the
American Board of Pathology.
(b) Two medical technologists.
(c) One bioanalyst who is a laboratory director.
(d) One qualified biochemist from the Nevada System of Higher
Education.
(e) One licensed physician actively engaged in the practice of
clinical medicine in this State.
5. No member of the [Advisory Committee] Subcommittee
may have any financial or business arrangement with any other
member which pertains to the business of laboratory analysis.
6. The Chief Medical Officer or a designated representative of
the Chief Medical Officer is an ex officio member of the [Advisory
Committee.] Subcommittee.
7. If a vacancy occurs in the membership of the [Advisory
Committee,] Subcommittee, the [Advisory Committee]
-
*SB78*

– 88 –
Subcommittee shall submit a letter to the Board with a
recommendation to fill the existing vacancy. The [Advisory
Committee] Subcommittee shall, at least once per year, determine
whether any vacancy in the membership of the [Advisory
Committee] Subcommittee exists.
8. The [Advisory Committee] Subcommittee shall meet at least
once every year.
9. Each member of the [Advisory Committee] Subcommittee is
entitled to receive:
(a) A salary of not more than $60, as fixed by the Board, for
each day’s attendance at a meeting of the [Committee;]
Subcommittee; and
(b) A per diem allowance and travel expenses at a rate fixed by
the Board, while engaged in the business of the [Committee.]
Subcommittee. The rate must not exceed the rate provided for state
officers and employees generally.
10. While engaged in the business of the [Committee,]
Subcommittee, each employee of the [Committee] Subcommittee is
entitled to receive a per diem allowance and travel expenses at a rate
fixed by the Board. The rate must not exceed the rate provided for
state officers and employees generally.
Sec. 96. NRS 653.450 is hereby amended to read as follows:
653.450 1. The Radiation Therapy and Radiologic Imaging
Advisory [Committee] Subcommittee of the Board is hereby
created.
2. The [Committee] Subcommittee consists of seven members,
all of whom are voting members, appointed by the [Governor.]
Board. The [Governor] Board shall ensure that the members of the
[Committee] Subcommittee represent the geographic diversity of
this State. The [Governor] Board shall appoint to the [Committee:]
Subcommittee:
(a) One member who holds a license and is certified by the
American Registry of Radiologic Technologists, or its successor
organization, to practice in the area of radiography.
(b) One member who holds a license and is certified by the
American Registry of Radiologic Technologists, or its successor
organization, to practice in the area of nuclear medicine technology.
(c) One member who holds a license and is certified by the
American Registry of Radiologic Technologists, or its successor
organization, to practice in the area of radiation therapy.
(d) One member who holds a limited license.
(e) One member who is a physician specializing in radiology.
(f) One member who is a physician specializing in an area other
than radiology, or a dentist, chiropractic physician or podiatrist.
-
*SB78*

– 89 –
(g) One member who is certified to provide clinical professional
services in a field of medical physics.
3. After the initial terms, the members of the [Committee]
Subcommittee serve terms of 3 years. A vacancy on the
[Committee] Subcommittee must be filled in the same manner as
the initial appointment. No member may serve more than two
consecutive terms.
4. Members of the [Committee] Subcommittee serve without
compensation, except that each member of the [Committee]
Subcommittee is entitled to receive the per diem allowance and
travel expenses provided for state officers and employees generally.
5. The [Committee] Subcommittee shall annually select a
Chair from among the members appointed pursuant to paragraphs
(a) to (d), inclusive, of subsection 2, and a Vice Chair from among
its members.
6. The [Committee] Subcommittee shall meet at least once
each year and such other times as requested by the Administrator of
the Division. The [Committee] Subcommittee may meet by
telephone, videoconference or other electronic means in accordance
with the provisions of chapter 241 of NRS. The Administrator shall
prescribe the agenda for each meeting. The [Committee]
Subcommittee may submit items to the Administrator to consider
for inclusion on the agenda for a meeting.
7. The [Committee] Subcommittee shall:
(a) Recommend to the Board a national professional
organization against which the scope of practice will be measured
pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS 653.460; and
(b) Make such other recommendations to the Board, the
Division and the Legislature concerning radiation therapy and
radiologic imaging as it deems proper.
Sec. 97. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2026.
H
-
*SB78*